Idaho, session 2025, H0054.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 45-617, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
45-617. ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEEDINGS FOR WAGE CLAIMS. (1) Wage claims
filed with the department, excluding potential penalties, are limited by the
same dollar amount that limits actions before the small claims department of
the magistrate division of the district court.
(2) The contested case provisions of the Idaho administrative proce-
dure act, chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, are inapplicable to proceedings
involving wage claims under this chapter.
(3) Once a wage claim has been properly filed with the department, the
provisions of this section shall provide the exclusive remedy for resolving
the wage claim. If at any time after the filing of the wage claim the depart-
ment determines that it lacks jurisdiction over the wage claim, the depart-
ment shall provide written notification of its determination to the claimant
and the employer. The claimant may then assert the wage claim in any court
of competent jurisdiction. In the event the department determines that it
lacks jurisdiction over the wage claim, the limitation periods provided for
in section 45-614, Idaho Code, shall be tolled from the date the wage claim
was filed with the department until the date notice that the department lacks
jurisdiction is mailed to the claimant, as provided in subsection (5) (8) of
this section.
(4) A department compliance officer shall examine wage claims filed
with the department and, on the basis of the facts found, shall determine
whether the wage claimant is entitled to an award for unpaid wages and penal-
ties. If the compliance officer is unable to determine whether wages and


penalties are owed, the claim may be referred to a hearing officer for a
determination. The department may adjust the amount of penalties awarded
for an employer's failure to comply with the requirements of section 45-606,
Idaho Code. The department may award no penalty or may award a penalty in any
amount up to the maximum amount allowed under section 45-607, Idaho Code. No
penalty shall be awarded by the department unless a specific finding is made
that wages were withheld willfully, arbitrarily and without just cause. The
department's determination shall include findings of fact and conclusions
of law. Before the determination becomes final or an appeal is filed, the
compliance or hearing officer that issued the determination may, on his own
motion, issue a revised determination. The determination or revised deter-
mination shall become a final determination unless, within fourteen (14)
days after notice, as provided in subsection (5) of this section, an appeal
is filed by the claimant or the employer in accordance with the department's
rules. If an appeal is not timely filed, the amount awarded by a final deter-
mination shall become immediately due and payable to the department. A final
determination may be enforced by the department in accordance with section
45-618, Idaho Code.
(5) The claimant and the employer shall be entitled to prompt service
of notice of determinations and decisions. Notice shall be deemed served if
delivered to the person being served, if mailed to the person's last known
address, or if electronically transmitted to the claimant at the claimant's
request and with the department's approval. Service by electronic transmis-
sion shall be deemed complete on the date notice is electronically transmit-
ted. The date indicated on determinations or decisions as the "date of ser-
vice" or "date of mailing" shall be presumed to be the date of service unless
otherwise shown by a preponderance of competent evidence.
(5) The department may dismiss wage claims without prejudice when a
claimant fails to respond within thirty (30) days to written notice from
the department that additional action is required on the claimant's part to
prosecute the claim. The thirty (30) day period for a response begins the
date the notice is mailed to the wage claimant's last known address. Mailed
responses from claimants are deemed received the date they are postmarked.
A wage claim dismissed for lack of prosecution may be refiled with the de-
partment subject to the limitation periods provided in section 45-614, Idaho
Code.
(6) The determinations and revised determinations shall include find-
ings of fact and conclusions of law and contain provisions advising the
claimant and employer of their rights to appeal the determination within
fourteen (14) days from the date of mailing or the date of electronic trans-
mission in a manner approved by the department.
(7) The timely filing of an appeal is mandatory and jurisdictional. The
determination or revised determination shall become a final determination
unless an appeal is filed by the claimant or the employer in accordance with
this chapter and the department's rules within fourteen (14) days after no-
tice provided pursuant to subsection (8) of this section. Provided, how-
ever, if a party establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that, because
of delay or error by the United States postal service or because of error on
the part of the department, a determination or revised determination was not
delivered to the party's last known address or transmitted electronically in


a manner approved by the department within fourteen (14) days of the date of
mailing or service indicated on the determination or revised determination,
the period for filing a timely appeal to the department or the commission ex-
tends to fourteen (14) days from the date of receipt of notice. If an appeal
is not timely filed, the amount awarded by a determination or revised deter-
mination shall become immediately due and payable to the department and may
be enforced by the department in accordance with section 45-618, Idaho Code.
(8) The claimant and the employer shall be entitled to prompt service
of notice of determinations and revised determinations. Notice shall be
deemed served if delivered to the person being served, if mailed to the per-
son's last known address, or if electronically transmitted to the claimant
at the claimant's request and with the department's approval. Service by
electronic transmission shall be deemed complete on the date notice is elec-
tronically transmitted. The date indicated on determinations or revised
determinations as the date of service or date of mailing shall be presumed to
be the date of service unless otherwise shown by a preponderance of competent
evidence.
(6) (9) An appeal from a wage claim determination or revised determina-
tion shall be in writing, signed by the appellant or the appellant's repre-
sentative and shall contain words that, by fair interpretation, request the
appeal process for a specific determination of the department. The appeal
may be filed by personal delivery, by mail, by electronic transmission, or by
fax to the wage and hour section of the department at the address indicated on
the wage claim determination. The date of personal delivery shall be noted
on the appeal and shall be deemed the date of filing. If mailed, the appeal
shall be deemed to be filed on the date of mailing as determined by the post-
mark. A faxed or electronically transmitted appeal shall be deemed filed on
the date received by the wage and hour section. A faxed or electronically
transmitted appeal received by the wage and hour section on a weekend or hol-
iday shall be deemed filed on the next business day.
(7) (10) To hear and decide appeals from determinations, the director
shall appoint appeals examiners who have been specifically trained to hear
wage claims. Unless the appeal is withdrawn, the appeals examiner shall af-
firm, modify, set aside or reverse the determination involved, after afford-
ing the claimant and the employer reasonable opportunity for a fair hear-
ing, or may refer a matter back to the compliance or hearing officer for fur-
ther action. The appeals examiner shall notify the claimant and the employer
of his decision by serving notice in the same manner as provided in subsec-
tion (5) (8) of this section. The decision shall set forth findings of fact
and conclusions of law. The appeals examiner may, upon application for re-
hearing by the claimant, the employer, or on his own motion, rehear, affirm,
modify, set aside or reverse any prior decision on the basis of the evidence
previously submitted or on the basis of additional evidence; provided, that
such application or motion be made within ten (10) days after the date of
service of the decision. A complete record shall be kept of all proceed-
ings in connection with an appealed wage claim. All testimony at any hear-
ing shall be recorded. Witnesses subpoenaed by the appeals examiner shall be
allowed fees at a rate prescribed by the director. If the claimant or the em-
ployer formally requests the appeals examiner to issue a subpoena for a wit-
ness whose evidence is deemed necessary, the appeals examiner shall promptly


issue the subpoena, unless such request is determined to be unreasonable.
Unless the claimant or the employer, within fourteen (14) days after service
of the decision of the appeals examiner, seeks judicial review pursuant to
section 45-619, Idaho Code, or unless an application or motion is made for a
rehearing of such decision, the decision of the appeals examiner shall be-
come final and the amount awarded by the decision shall become immediately
due and payable to the department. A decision that has become final may be
enforced by the department according to section 45-618, Idaho Code.
(8) (11) No person acting on behalf of the director shall participate in
any case in which he has a direct or indirect personal interest.
(9) (12)(a) Any right, fact, or matter in issue, directly based upon or
necessarily involved in a determination or decision of the appeals ex-
aminer that has become final, shall be conclusive for all the purposes
of this chapter as between the claimant and the employer who had notice
of such determination or decision. Subject to judicial review as set
forth in this chapter, any determination or decision shall be conclu-
sive for all purposes of this chapter and shall not be subject to collat-
eral attack irrespective of notice.
(b) No finding of fact or conclusion of law contained in a determination
or decision rendered pursuant to this chapter by an appeals examiner, a
court, or any other person authorized to make such determinations shall
have preclusive effect in any other action or proceeding, except pro-
ceedings that are brought:
(i) Pursuant to this chapter;
(ii) To collect wage claims; or
(iii) To challenge the constitutionality of provisions of this
chapter or administrative proceedings under this chapter.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 13, Title 72, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 72-1303A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
72-1303A. ABLE TO WORK -- AVAILABLE FOR SUITABLE WORK. (1) "Able to
work" means having the physical and mental ability to perform work for which
a claimant is qualified under conditions ordinarily existing during a normal
workweek. It does not mean that a person must be able to perform work in his
customary occupation or the same kind of work he last performed. A person
who is able to work only part of the workday or part of the workweek is not
considered able to work.
(2) An individual with a disability under the Americans with disabili-
ties act, 42 U.S.C. 12112, as defined by 29 CFR 1630.2(g), whose disability
prevents the claimant from working full time or during particular shifts is
not deemed unable to work or unavailable for work for as long as the claimant
demonstrates he is able to perform some work and remains available for work
to the full extent of his ability. A qualified claimant with a disability who
is able to work with or without a reasonable accommodation will be considered
as having complied with the requirement of being available for work when the
claimant is willing to work the maximum number of hours the claimant is able
to work. Qualified claimants with disabilities must meet all other eligi-
bility requirements, including the illness provisions of this section.


(3)(a) A claimant who withdraws from the labor market because of ill-
ness or injury prior to filing a claim is not eligible for unemployment
benefits until he is able and available for work; provided, no claimant
shall be considered ineligible with respect to any week of unemployment
for failure to comply with this section if the failure is due to an ill-
ness or disability that commences after applying for unemployment bene-
fits and no work that would have been suitable prior to the beginning of
the illness or injury has been offered the claimant.
(b) A person who claims benefits under this illness provision must re-
main available for job referral by the department; however, he may leave
the area for treatment of his illness and continue to be eligible under
the provisions of this section.
(4) "Available for suitable work" means remaining within and actively
seeking suitable work in a locality in which the individual has earned wages
subject to the provisions of this chapter during the individual's base pe-
riod or, if the individual moves his permanent residence outside of that lo-
cality, then in a locality where suitable work normally is performed. Being
available for suitable work encompasses a readiness, ability, and willing-
ness to work and to find a job, including the possibility of marketing the
claimant's services in the claimant's area of availability. The type of work
for which the claimant is available must exist in the claimant's area to the
extent that a normal unemployed person would generally find work within a
reasonable period of time.
(5) For the purposes of this section, "workweek" means:
(a) For an employer-attached or union-attached classification, the
claimant's normal workweek as defined by the employer or union;
(b) For a work-seeking classification, Monday through Friday, 8:00
a.m. to 5:00 p.m.; or
(c) For an approved training classification, regular class hours.
(6) Claimant work availability requirements are waived on Independence
Day, Thanksgiving Day, Christmas Day, and New Year's Day.
(7) A claimant seeking work must be willing to travel the distance nor-
mally traveled by other workers in his area and occupation.
(8) An individual who restricts availability to part-time work pur-
suant to section 72-1366(4)(d), Idaho Code, is considered fully employed and
ineligible to receive benefits if the individual works hours comparable to
the part-time work experience in the individual's base period. A claimant
must be available for a full workweek and a full, normal workday unless the
claimant establishes that the majority of weeks worked during the claimant's
base period were for less than full-time work, which is established where the
total base period wages divided by the claimant's last regular rate of pay
does not exceed two thousand seventy-nine (2,079) hours.
(9) A claimant who is incarcerated for any part of the workweek is not
eligible for benefits for that week, unless the claimant can establish he has
work release privileges that would provide him a reasonable opportunity to
meet his work search requirements and obtain full-time employment.
(10) A claimant who moves to a remote locality where there is little pos-
sibility of obtaining suitable work is not eligible for benefits.
(11) A public official who receives pay and performs full-time service
is considered employed and not eligible for benefits. Part-time officials,


even though receiving pay, may be considered available for work the same as
any other individual employed on a part-time basis.
(12) Performing public service, including voluntary non-remunerated
service, does not disqualify an individual for benefits as long as he meets
the other requirements of this section.
(13) A claimant who restricts his availability to only work done within
the home in a manner that severely limits the work available to him is not
eligible for benefits, unless the claimant works in an industry where tele-
working is common.
(14) A person who is attending school or a training course not approved
by the department pursuant to section 72-1366(8), Idaho Code, may be eligi-
ble for benefits if attendance does not conflict with that person's avail-
ability for work or for seeking work and if he will discontinue attendance
upon receipt of an offer of employment that creates a conflict between em-
ployment and the schooling or training.
(15) All claimants, regardless of their attachment to an industry or em-
ployer, must meet the same standard of remaining within their local labor
market area during the workweek in order to be considered available for work,
unless the primary purpose of a temporary absence is to seek work in another
labor market. Claimants otherwise eligible to receive benefits while par-
ticipating in an approved training program or course are not deemed ineli-
gible when the training or course occurs outside of their local labor market
due to the unavailability of similar programs or courses within their local
labor market.
(16) To remain eligible for benefits, claimants must remain within a
state, territory, or country included in the United States department of
labor's interstate benefit payment plan.
(17) A claimant who places unreasonable restrictions on working condi-
tions that significantly hinder his availability and search for work is not
eligible for benefits.
(18) A person on a vacation approved by his employer during time when
work is available is not eligible for benefits.
(19) A claimant is eligible for benefits if the wages or other condi-
tions of available work are substantially less favorable to the claimant
than those prevailing for similar work in the local area.
(20) A claimant is not eligible for benefits if he unduly restricts his
availability for work by insisting on a wage rate that is higher than the pre-
vailing wage for similar work in that area.
(21) The claimant's prior earnings and past experience are considered
in determining whether work is suitable.
(22) For the purpose of approving a waiver of the two (2) year limitation
on school or training courses specified by section 72-1366(8)(c)(ii), Idaho
Code, for claimants who lack skills to compete in the labor market, the fol-
lowing criteria must be met:
(a) The claimant must demonstrate a workable financial plan for com-
pleting the school or training course after his benefits have been ex-
hausted;
(b) The claimant must establish there is a demand for the occupation in
which the claimant will be trained. An occupation is considered in de-


mand when work opportunities are available and there is not a surplus of
qualified applicants; and
(c) At the time that the claimant applies for the waiver, the usual du-
ration of the school or training course is no longer than two (2) years.
SECTION 3. That Section 72-1304, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1304. AGRICULTURAL LABOR.
(1)(a) "Agricultural labor" means all services performed:
(a) (i) On a farm, in the employ of any person in connection with
cultivating the soil, or raising or harvesting any agricultural,
aquacultural or horticultural commodities, including the rais-
ing, shearing, feeding, caring for, training, and management of
livestock, bees, fish, poultry, furbearers, and wildlife;
(b) (ii) In the employ of the owner or tenant or other operator of a
farm in connection with the operation, management, conservation,
improvement, or maintenance of such farm and its tools and equip-
ment, or in salvaging timber or clearing land of brush and other
debris left by a hurricane if the major part of such service is per-
formed on a farm;
(c) (iii) In connection with the operation or maintenance of
ditches, canals, reservoirs, or waterways not owned or operated
for profit and used exclusively for supplying and storing water,
at least ninety percent (90%) of which was ultimately delivered
for agricultural purposes during the preceding calendar year; and
(d) (iv) In the employ of any farm operator or group of operators,
organized or unorganized, in handling, planting, drying, packing,
packaging, eviscerating, processing, freezing, grading, storing,
or delivering to storage or to market or to a carrier for trans-
portation to market in its unmanufactured state any agricultural,
aquacultural or horticultural commodities, if such operator or
group, in both the current and preceding calendar years, produced
more than one-half (1/2) of the commodities with respect to which
such service is performed.
(b) Whether a farm operator described in subsection (1)(a)(iv) of this
section produced more than one-half (1/2) of the commodities with re-
spect to services performed shall be determined based on:
(i) Quantity, where only one (1) commodity is processed; or
(ii) Wages, where multiple commodities are processed. The pro
rata share of wages paid for processing commodities raised by the
farm operator compared to the total wages paid for processing all
commodities shall determine whether a farm operator produced more
than one-half (1/2) of the commodities processed.
(c) This subsection is not applicable to services performed in commer-
cial canning, freezing, or dehydrating, or in connection with any agri-
cultural, aquacultural or horticultural commodity after its delivery
to a terminal market for distribution for consumption.
(2) "Custom farming" means "agricultural labor" for the purposes of
this chapter.


(3) "Farm" includes stock, dairy, fish, poultry, fruit, furbearer and
truck farms, plantations, ranches, nurseries, hatcheries, ranges, green-
houses or other similar structures used primarily for the raising of agri-
cultural, aquacultural or horticultural commodities, and orchards.
(4) "Unmanufactured state" means retention of its original form and
substance.
(5) "Terminal market" means a place of business to which products are
shipped in a sorted, graded, packaged condition, ready for immediate sale.
SECTION 4. That Section 72-1306, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Chapter 13, Title 72, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 72-1306, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
72-1306. BASE PERIODS. (1) "Regular base period" means the first four
(4) of the last five (5) completed calendar quarters immediately preceding
the beginning of a benefit year.
(2) "Alternate base period" means the last four (4) completed calen-
dar quarters immediately preceding the beginning of a benefit year. If a
claimant has insufficient wages in the regular base period to establish eli-
gibility for unemployment benefits, the alternate base period shall be used.
(3) "Total temporary disability base period" means the first four (4)
of the last five (5) completed calendar quarters immediately prior to the
Sunday of the week in which a medically verifiable temporary total disabil-
ity has occurred. A claimant who has or has had a medically verifiable tem-
porary total disability and insufficient wages in the regular or alternate
base periods to establish eligibility for unemployment benefits shall use
the total temporary disability base period. To use the total temporary dis-
ability base period, a claimant must file for benefits within three (3) years
of the beginning of the temporary total disability and no later than six (6)
months after the end of the temporary total disability.
SECTION 6. That Chapter 13, Title 72, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 72-1311A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
72-1311A. COMPELLING PERSONAL CIRCUMSTANCES. (1) "Compelling per-
sonal circumstances," for the purpose of section 72-1366(4), Idaho Code,
means:
(a) The serious illness, necessary treatment by a health care provider,
death, or funeral of an immediate family member;
(b) The wedding of the claimant or an immediate family member;
(c) The birth of the claimant's child;
(d) Sincerely held religious beliefs that do not allow working on a cer-
tain day;
(e) Travel not exceeding twenty-four (24) hours necessary to obtain es-
sential goods and services not available in the claimant's locality; or
(f) Required service for jury duty or attendance at court proceedings
or depositions pursuant to a lawfully issued subpoena.


(2) For purposes of this section, "immediate family member" means a
claimant's spouse, child, foster child, parent, brother, sister, grandpar-
ent, grandchild, or the same relation by marriage.
SECTION 7. That Section 72-1312A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1312A. CORPORATE OFFICER -- EMPLOYMENT. (1) A bona fide corporate
officer meeting the requirements of section 72-1312 72-1352A, Idaho Code,
whose claim for benefits is based on any wages with a corporation in which the
corporate officer or a family member of the corporate officer has an owner-
ship interest shall be:
(a) Not "unemployed" and thus ineligible for benefits in any week dur-
ing the corporate officer's term of office with the corporation, even if
wages are not being paid.
(b) "Unemployed" in any week the corporate officer is not employed by
the corporation for a period of indefinite duration because of circum-
stances beyond the control of the corporate officer or a family member
of the corporate officer with an ownership interest in the corporation,
and the period of "unemployment" extends at least through the corporate
officer's benefit year end date. If at any time during the benefit year
the corporate officer resumes or returns to work for the corporation,
it shall be a rebuttable presumption that the corporate officer's unem-
ployment was due to circumstances within the corporate officer's con-
trol or the control of a family member with an ownership interest in the
corporation, and all benefits paid to the corporate officer during the
benefit year shall be considered an overpayment for which the corporate
officer shall be liable for repayment.
(2) For purposes of this section, "family member" is a person related
by blood or marriage as parent, stepparent, grandparent, spouse, brother,
sister, child, stepchild, adopted child or grandchild.
(3) Circumstances beyond a corporate officer's control or the control
of a family member with an ownership interest in the corporation are circum-
stances that last through the corporate officer's benefit year end date and
include, without limitation, the following:
(a) Unemployment due to the corporate officer's removal from the corpo-
ration under circumstances that satisfy the personal eligibility con-
ditions of section 72-1366, Idaho Code;
(b) Unemployment due to dissolution of the corporation; or
(c) Unemployment due to the sale of the corporation to an unrelated
third party.
SECTION 8. That Section 72-1315, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1315. COVERED EMPLOYER. (1) "Covered employer" means:
(1) (a) Any person who, in any calendar quarter in either the current or
preceding calendar year, paid for services in covered employment wages
of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) or more, or, for some por-
tion of a day in each of twenty (20) different calendar weeks, whether or
not consecutive, in either the current or preceding calendar year, em-


ployed at least one (1) individual, irrespective of whether the same in-
dividual was in employment in each such day. For purposes of this sub-
section there shall not be taken into account any wages paid to, or in
employment of, an employee performing domestic services referred to in
subsection (8) paragraph (h) of this subsection.
(2) (b) All individuals performing services within this state for an
employer who maintains two (2) or more separate establishments within
this state shall be deemed to be performing services for a single em-
ployer.
(3) (c) Each individual engaged to perform or assist in performing the
work of any person in the service of an employer shall be deemed to be
employed by such employer for all the purposes of this chapter, whether
such individual was engaged or paid directly by such employer or by such
person, provided the employer had actual or constructive knowledge of
the work.
(4) (d) Any employer, whether or not an employer at the time of acqui-
sition, who acquires the organization, trade, or business or substan-
tially all the assets thereof, of another who at the time of such acqui-
sition was a covered employer.
(5) (e) In the case of agricultural labor, any person who:
(a) (i) During any calendar quarter in the calendar year or the
preceding calendar year paid wages in cash of twenty thousand dol-
lars ($20,000) or more for agricultural labor; or
(b) (ii) On each of some twenty (20) days during the calendar year
or during the preceding calendar year, each day being in a differ-
ent calendar week, employed at least ten (10) individuals in em-
ployment in agricultural labor for some portion of the day.
(c) (iii) Such labor is not agricultural labor when it is performed
by an individual who is an alien admitted to the United States
to perform agricultural labor pursuant to sections 214(c) and
101(a)(15)(H) of the immigration and nationality act, unless the
individual is required to be covered by the federal unemployment
tax act.
(6) (f) A licensed farm labor contractor, as provided in chapter 16,
title 44, Idaho Code, who furnishes any individual to perform agricul-
tural labor for another person.
(7) (g) An unlicensed, nonexempt farm labor contractor, as provided
in chapter 16, title 44, Idaho Code, who furnishes any individual to
perform agricultural labor for another person not treated as a covered
employer under subsection (5) paragraph (e) of this subsection. If an
unlicensed, nonexempt farm labor contractor furnishes any individual
to perform agricultural labor for another person who is treated as a
covered employer under subsection (5) paragraph (e) of this subsection,
both such other person and the unlicensed, nonexempt farm labor con-
tractor shall be jointly and severally liable for any moneys due under
the provisions of this chapter.
(8) (h)(i) In the case of domestic service in performed in the
operation or maintenance of a private home, local college club, or
local chapter of a college fraternity or sorority, any person who
during any calendar quarter in the calendar year or the preceding


calendar year paid wages in cash of one thousand dollars ($1,000)
or more for such service. Domestic service includes, without
limitation, services rendered as cooks, waiters, butlers, maids,
janitors, handymen, gardeners, housekeepers, housemothers, and
in-home caregivers, as distinguished from services as an employee
in pursuit of an employer's trade, occupation, profession, enter-
prise, or vocation.
(ii) A person treated as a covered employer under this subsection
(8) paragraph shall not be treated as a covered employer with re-
spect to wages paid for any service other than domestic service
referred to in this subsection (8) paragraph unless such per-
son is treated as a covered employer under subsection (1) or (5)
paragraphs (a) or (e) of this subsection, with respect to such
other service.
(9) (i) Any governmental entity as defined in section 72-1322C, Idaho
Code.
(10) (j) A nonprofit organization as defined in section 72-1322D, Idaho
Code.
(11) (k) An employer who has elected coverage pursuant to the provi-
sions of subsection (3) of section 72-1352, Idaho Code.
(2) For purposes of coverage under this chapter, a limited liability
company shall have the same status as it elected for federal tax purposes, or
as that status may be determined or required by the federal government. Any
member of a limited liability company that has elected to be treated as a cor-
poration for federal tax purposes shall be treated as a corporate officer un-
der this chapter.
SECTION 9. That Section 72-1316, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1316. COVERED EMPLOYMENT. (1) "Covered employment" means an indi-
vidual's entire service performed by him for wages or under any contract of
hire, written or oral, express or implied, for a covered employer or covered
employers. Unless expressly exempted, services performed by corporate of-
ficers are considered services in employment and are covered for purposes of
this chapter.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, services shall be
deemed to be in covered employment if a tax is required to be paid or was re-
quired to be paid the previous year on such services under the federal unem-
ployment tax act or if the director determines that as a condition for full
tax credit against the tax imposed by the federal unemployment tax act such
services are required to be covered under this chapter as a condition for
full tax credit against the tax imposed by the federal unemployment tax act.
(3) Services covered by an election pursuant to section 72-1352, Idaho
Code, and services covered by an election approved by the director pursuant
to section 72-1344, Idaho Code, shall be deemed to be covered employment dur-
ing the effective period of such election.
(4) Services performed by an individual for remuneration shall, for the
purposes of the employment security law, be covered employment unless it is
shown:


(a) That the worker has been and will continue to be free from control
or direction in the performance of his work, both under his contract of
service and in fact; and
(b) That the worker is engaged in an independently established trade,
occupation, profession, or business.
(5) "Covered employment" shall include an individual's entire service,
performed within or both within and without this state:
(a) If the service is localized in this state; or
(b) If the service is not localized in any state but some of the service
is performed in this state, and:
(i) The individual's base of operations or the place from which
such service is directed or controlled is in this state; or
(ii) The individual's base of operations or place from which such
service is directed or controlled is not in any state in which some
part of the service is performed, but the individual's residence
is in this state.
(c) Service shall be deemed to be localized within a state if:
(i) The service is performed entirely within such state; or
(ii) The service is performed both within and without such state,
but the service performed without such state is incidental, tempo-
rary or transitory in nature or consists of isolated transactions,
as compared to the individual's service within the state.
(d) "Covered employment" shall include an individual's service, wher-
ever performed within the United States, or Canada, if:
(i) Such service is not covered under the unemployment compensa-
tion law of any other state, the Virgin Islands, or Canada; and
(ii) The place from which the service is directed or controlled is
in this state.
(6) "Covered employment" shall include the services of an individual
who is a citizen of the United States, performed outside the United States,
except in Canada, in the employ of an American employer, other than service
which that is deemed "covered employment" under the provisions of subsection
(5) of this section or the parallel provisions of another state's law, if:
(a) The employer's principal place of business in the United States is
located in this state; or
(b) The employer has no place of business in the United States; but
(i) Is an individual who is a resident of this state; or
(ii) Is a corporation which that is organized under the laws of
this state; or
(iii) Is a partnership or a trust and the number of the partners or
trustees who are residents of this state is greater than the number
who are residents of any other state; or
(c) None of the criteria of provision (a) or (b) of this subsection is
met but the employer has elected coverage in this state, or, the em-
ployer having failed to elect coverage in any state, the individual has
filed a claim for benefits based on such service, under the law of this
state;
(d) An "American employer" for purposes of this subparagraph means a
person who is:
(i) An individual who is a resident of the United States; or


(ii) A partnership if two-thirds (2/3) or more of the partners are
residents of the United States; or
(iii) A trust if all of the trustees are residents of the United
States; or
(iv) A corporation organized under the laws of the United States
or of any state.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, "United States" means the states,
the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and the Vir-
gin Islands.
(7) Any employer claiming that services performed for the employer, or
remuneration paid by the employer, do not constitute covered employment or
covered wages under this chapter shall make a report to the department of all
pertinent facts on which said claim is based, which report shall be signed by
the employer or an authorized representative.
SECTION 10. That Section 72-1316A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
72-1316A. EXEMPT EMPLOYMENT. "Exempt employment" means service per-
formed:
(1) By an individual in the employ of his spouse or child.
(2) By a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years in the employ of
his father or mother.
(3) By an individual under the age of twenty-two (22) years who is en-
rolled as a student in a full-time program at an accredited nonprofit or pub-
lic education institution for which credit at such institution is earned in a
program which that combines academic instruction with work experience. This
subsection shall not apply to service performed in a program established at
the request of an employer or group of employers.
(4) In the employ of the United States government or an instrumentality
of the United States exempt under the constitution of the United States from
the contributions imposed by this chapter.
(5) In the employ of a governmental entity in the exercise of duties:
(a) As an elected official;
(b) As a member of a legislative body, or a member of the judiciary, of a
state or political subdivision thereof;
(c) As a member of the state national guard or air national guard;
(d) As an employee serving on a temporary basis in case of fire, storm,
snow, earthquake, flood, or similar emergency;
(e) In a position which that, pursuant to the laws of this state, is des-
ignated as: (i) a major nontenured policymaking or advisory position,;
or (ii) a policymaking or advisory position which that ordinarily does
not require more than eight (8) hours per week; or
(f) As an election official or election worker, including, but not lim-
ited to, a poll worker, an election judge, an election clerk or any other
member of an election board, if the amount of remuneration received by
the individual during the calendar year for services as an election of-
ficial or election worker is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(6) By an inmate of a correctional, custodial or penal institution, if
such services are performed for or within such institution.
(7) In the employ of:


(a) A church or convention or association of churches; or
(b) An organization which that is operated primarily for religious pur-
poses and which that is operated, supervised, controlled, or princi-
pally supported by a church, or convention or association of churches;
or
(c) In the employ of an institution of higher education, if it is de-
voted primarily to preparation of a student for the ministry or training
candidates to become members of a religious order; or
(d) By a duly ordained, commissioned, or licensed minister of a church
in the exercise of his ministry or by a member of a religious order in the
exercise of duties required by such order.
(8) By a program participant in a facility that provides rehabilitation
for individuals whose earning capacity is impaired by age, physical or men-
tal limitation, or injury or provides remunerative work for individuals who,
because of their impaired physical or mental capacity, cannot be readily ab-
sorbed into the labor market.
(9) As By an individual receiving work relief or work training as part
of an unemployment work relief program or as part of an unemployment work
training program assisted or financed in whole or in part by any federal
agency or an agency of a state or political subdivision thereof, by an indi-
vidual receiving such work relief or work training.
(10) Service with respect to which unemployment insurance is payable
under an unemployment insurance system established by an act of congress
other than the social security act.
(11) As a student nurse in the employ of a hospital or nurses' training
school by an individual who is enrolled and is regularly attending courses in
a nurses' training school approved pursuant to state law, and service per-
formed as an intern in the employ of a hospital by an individual who has com-
pleted a course in a medical school approved pursuant to state law.
(12) By an individual under the age of eighteen (18) years in the deliv-
ery or distribution of newspapers or shopping news not including delivery or
distribution to any point for subsequent delivery or distribution.
(13) By an individual for a person as an insurance agent or as an insur-
ance solicitor, if all such service performed by such individual for such
person is performed for remuneration solely by way of commission.
(14) By an individual for a real estate broker as an associate real es-
tate broker or as a real estate salesman, if all such service performed by
such individual for such person is performed for remuneration solely by way
of commission.
(15) Service covered by an election approved by the agency charged with
the administration of any other state or federal unemployment insurance law,
in accordance with an arrangement pursuant to section 72-1344, Idaho Code.
(16) In the employ of a school or college by a student who is enrolled and
regularly attending classes at such school or college.
(17) In the employ of a hospital by a resident patient of such hospital.
(18) By a member of an AmeriCorps program.
(19) By an individual who is paid less than fifty dollars ($50.00) per
calendar quarter for performing work that is not in the course of the em-
ployer's trade or business, or that does not promote or advance the trade or
business of the employer, and who is not regularly employed by such employer


to perform such service. For the purposes of this subsection, an individ-
ual shall be deemed to be regularly employed by an employer during a calendar
quarter only if:
(a) On each of some twenty-four (24) days during such quarter such in-
dividual performs for such employer for some portion of the day service
not in the course of the employer's trade or business; or
(b) Such individual was so employed by such employer in the performance
of such service during the preceding calendar quarter.
(20) By an individual who is engaged in the trade or business of selling
or soliciting the sale of consumer products in a private home or a location
other than in a permanent retail establishment, provided the following cri-
teria are met:
(a) Substantially all the remuneration, whether or not received in
cash, for the performance of the services is directly related to sales
or other output, including the performance of services, rather than to
the number of hours worked; and
(b) The services performed by the individual are performed pursuant to
a written contract between the individual and the person for whom the
services are performed, and the contract provides that the individual
shall not be treated as an employee for federal and state tax purposes.
Such exemption applies solely to the individual's engagement in the trade or
business of selling or soliciting the sale of consumer products in a private
home or location other than in a permanent retail establishment.
(21) By a person who operates a motor vehicle that: (a) such person owns
or holds pursuant to a bona fide lease; and (b) is leased to a motor carrier as
defined in 49 U.S.C. section 13102, pursuant to a written contract, and in no
event will the motor carrier be determined to be the covered employer of such
person or the covered employer of an employee of such person.
SECTION 11. That Chapter 13, Title 72, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 72-1316B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
72-1316B. FULL-TIME EMPLOYMENT. Full-time employment exists where a
claimant works what are customarily considered full-time hours for a week
for that industry or where the earnings are more than one and one-half (1 1/2)
times the claimant's weekly benefit amount.
SECTION 12. That Section 72-1319, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1319. ELIGIBLE EMPLOYER. (1) "Eligible employer" means a covered
employer who has completed a qualifying period as defined in subsection (2)
of this section and who has filed all payroll reports required, has paid,
on or before the cutoff date, all contributions and penalties due, and has
established a record of accumulated contributions in excess of benefits
charged to his account. For the purposes of this section, delinquencies
of a minor nature may be disregarded if the director is satisfied that such
covered employer has acted in good faith and that forfeiture of a reduced
taxable wage rate because of such minor delinquency would be inequitable.


(2) "Qualifying period" shall be the period of three (3) consecutive
years ending on the computation date in which, during all of said years, the
employer shall be subject to the requirements of this chapter, except that a
new employer shall have a qualifying period of one (1) year ending on the com-
putation date in which, during all of said year, the employer shall be sub-
ject to the requirements of this chapter.
(3) Any employer who ceases to have covered employment for a period of
six (6) consecutive quarters or more shall complete another qualifying pe-
riod to be eligible for consideration for a reduced contribution rate.
SECTION 13. That Chapter 13, Title 72, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 72-1326, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
72-1326. REPORTABLE INCOME. (1) All reportable income must be re-
ported to the department through the continued claims filing process in the
manner prescribed by the department.
(2) Reportable income includes but is not limited to:
(a) Wages and other payments earned or received from an employer for
services performed or from performing self-employment work;
(b) Amounts received as a result of labor relations awards or judgments
for back pay, or for disputed wages, that constitute wages for the weeks
in which the claimant would have earned them or are assignable to the
weeks stipulated in the award or judgment;
(c) Gratuities or tips for the week in which each gratuity or tip is
earned;
(d) Holiday pay reportable as though earned in the week in which the
holiday occurs;
(e) All non-periodic remuneration such as one-time severance pay,
profit sharing, and bonus pay reportable for the week in which paid;
(f) An equal portion of a periodic severance payment reportable in each
week of the period covered by the payment. Severance pay received in a
lump sum payment at the time of severance of the employment relationship
must be reported when paid;
(g) Vacation pay allocable to a certain period of time in accordance
with an employment agreement reportable in the week to which it is allo-
cable. Vacation pay received in a lump sum payment at the time of sever-
ance of the employment relationship must be reported when paid;
(h) Wages for services performed prior to a claimant's separation,
which are reportable for the week in which earned;
(i) Contract payments to a claimant other than an employee of an educa-
tional institution who is bound by a contract that does not prevent him
from accepting other employment, but who receives pay for a period of
not working. The claimant is required to report the contract payments
as earnings in equal portions in each week of the period covered by the
contract;
(j) Remuneration received for relief work or public service work;
(k) Temporary disability benefits under a worker's compensation law of
any state or under a similar law of the United States, reported in an
amount attributable to such week; and


(l) Pension or retirement payments when the pension, retirement pay,
annuity, or other similar periodic payment is made under a plan main-
tained or contributed to by a base period employer. The dollar amount of
the weekly pension will be deducted from the claimant's weekly benefit
amount unless the claimant has made contributions toward the pension.
If the claimant has made contributions toward the pension plan, no
deduction for the pension will be made from the claimant's weekly ben-
efit amount. The burden shall be on the claimant to establish that he
has made contributions toward the pension, retirement pay, annuity or
other similar payment plan. Any change in the amount of the pension,
retirement, or annuity payments that affects the deduction from the
claimant's weekly benefit amount will be applied in the first full week
after the effective date of the change.
(3) Reportable income does not include:
(a) Injury or disability compensation payments; or
(b) Amounts awarded to a claimant as a penalty or damages against an em-
ployer, other than for lost wages.
SECTION 14. That Section 72-1327A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
72-1327A. VALID CLAIM. (1) "Valid claim" means any application for
benefits which for a compensable week that is found to be eligible as pro-
vided in section 72-1367, Idaho Code, and which that has been filed in
accordance with this chapter and such rules as the director may prescribe.
(2) To be a valid claim for benefits, a claim must be filed during:
(a) A week of no work;
(b) A week of less than full-time work in which the total wages payable
to the claimant for work performed in such week amount to less than one
and one-half (1 1/2) times the claimant's weekly benefit amount; or
(c) A week in which the claimant is separated from employment.
SECTION 15. That Section 72-1328, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1328. WAGES. (1) "Wages" shall include all remuneration, or the
cash value of all remuneration in a medium other than cash, for personal ser-
vices performed or to be performed, from whatever source, including, without
limitation:
(a) All remuneration for personal services from whatever source, in-
cluding commissions and bonuses and the cash value of all remuneration
in any medium other than cash;
(a) Hourly and salaried earnings, commissions, bonuses, draws, distri-
butions, dividends, and any other forms or types of payments if paid in
exchange for services;
(b) Bonuses, prizes, and gifts given to an employee in recognition of
services, sales, or production;
(c) Commissions for past services in covered employment;
(d) Remuneration paid to corporate officers in exchange for services
performed or to be performed for or on behalf of the corporation;
(e) Salary advances against commissions;


(f) All forms of profit sharing for services rendered unless specifi-
cally exempt under this chapter;
(g) Excess travel or employer business allowances over actual expense,
or over the federal allowance per diem rate for the area of travel, un-
less returned to the employer;
(h) Vacation or idle-time pay, no matter when paid;
(i) Personal expense reimbursement, such as clothing, family expenses,
and rent;
(b) (j) All tips received while performing services in covered employ-
ment totaling twenty dollars ($20.00) or more in a month, which are re-
ported in writing to the employer as required under federal law; and
(c) (k) Any employer contribution under a qualified cash or deferred
agreement as defined in 26 U.S.C. 401(k) to the extent such contribution
is not included in gross income by reason of 26 U.S.C. 402(a)(8).
(2) The term "wages" shall not include:
(a) Payments (including any amount paid by an employer for insurance
or annuities, or into a fund, to provide for any such payment) made to
or on behalf of an individual or any of his dependents under a plan es-
tablished by an employer that makes provision generally for individuals
performing service for him (or for such individuals generally and their
dependents) or for a class or classes of such individuals (or for a class
or classes of such individuals and their dependents) on account of: (i)
sickness or accident disability (but, in the case of payments made to
an employee or any of his dependents, this subparagraph shall exclude
from the term "wages" only payments received under a worker's compen-
sation law), or (ii) medical or hospitalization expenses in connection
with sickness or accident disability, or (iii) death;
(b) Payments on account of sickness or accident disability, or medical
or hospitalization expenses in connection with sickness or accident
disability, made by an employer to or on behalf of an individual per-
forming services for him after the expiration of six (6) calendar months
following the last calendar month in which the individual performed
services for such employer;
(c) Payments made by an employer to or on behalf of an individual per-
forming services for him or his beneficiary: (i) from or to a trust de-
scribed in section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code that is exempt
from tax under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code at the time
of such payment unless such payment is made to an individual perform-
ing services for the trust as remuneration for such services and not as
a beneficiary of the trust, or (ii) under or to an annuity plan that, at
the time of such payments, is a plan described in section 403(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code, or (iii) under a cafeteria plan within the mean-
ing of section 125 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(d) Payments made by an employer (without deduction from the remunera-
tion of the individual in its employ) of the tax imposed upon on an indi-
vidual in his employ under section 3101 of the Internal Revenue Code; or
(e) Noncash payments for farm work. Noncash payments for farm work will
be excluded from wages if they are de minimis in relation to the amount
of cash wages paid to the farmworkers or are not intended to be treated
as the cash equivalent of wages or as the cash payment of wages;


(f) Prizes or gifts for special occasions that are expressions of good-
will;
(g) Bonuses paid for signing a contract;
(h) Fees paid to participate periodically in meetings of boards of di-
rectors unless exceedingly high as compared to other employers in the
same industry of relatively the same size;
(i) Drawings or advances by partners of a partnership or by members of
a limited liability company treated for federal tax purposes as a part-
nership or sole proprietorship;
(j) Charges pursuant to a rental agreement for personal equipment pro-
vided by the employee on the job if the employee has received a reason-
able wage for services performed and the fees are held separately on the
employer's records;
(k) Stock or membership interests issued for purposes other than ser-
vices performed or to be performed;
(l) Reimbursement for actual employee expenses or business allowance
arrangements with employees that requires them to have paid or incurred
reasonable job-related expenses while performing services as employ-
ees, to account adequately to the employer for these expenses, and to
return any excess reimbursement or allowance;
(m) Payments for employee travel expenses, provided payments are job-
related expenses incurred while performing services, payments do not
exceed actual expenses or the federal allowance per diem rate for the
area of travel, and records for days of travel pertaining to per diem
payments are verifiable;
(n) Employee fringe benefits as set forth in section 132 of the Internal
Revenue Code, which are excluded from an employee's gross income and not
subject to federal unemployment taxes; or
(o) Payments of any kind by a partnership to its partner or by a sole
proprietorship to its owner.
(3) Any third party making a sickness or accident disability payment
not excluded from wages under subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section shall be
treated as the employer with respect to such payment of wages for the pur-
poses of this chapter.
(4) The department shall determine the fair market value of any other
remuneration, regardless of its classification, form, or label, that is paid
to a worker in exchange for services, taking into account factors such as the
prevailing wage for similar services and wages specified in any contract of
hire. Any wages so determined by the department shall be reported to the em-
ployer.
SECTION 16. That Chapter 13, Title 72, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 72-1328A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
72-1328A. BOARD, LODGING, AND MEALS. (1) When board, lodging, meals,
or any other payment-in-kind comprise, in whole or in part, an employee's
wages, the value of such board, lodging, or other payment shall be determined
as follows:
(a) If a cash value is agreed upon in any contract of hire, the amount
so agreed upon shall be used if it is a reasonable fair market value. If


there is no agreement or if the contract of hire states an amount less
than a reasonable fair market value, the department shall determine the
reasonable fair market value to be used.
(b) The value of meals and lodging furnished by an employer to the
employee shall not be included in the employee's gross income when
furnished on the employer's business premises for the employer's con-
venience and, in the case of lodging but not meals, the employees are
required to accept the lodging in order to properly perform their duties
and as a condition of their employment.
(c) In order to exclude the value of lodging from an employee's gross
wages, the employer must show that the wages paid to the employee for
services performed meet the prevailing wage for those services. If the
employer's records do not show or establish that the employee received
the prevailing wage for services performed, then the reasonable fair
market value of the lodging shall be included as wages in the employee's
gross income.
(2) Meals or lodging furnished shall be considered for the employer's
convenience if the employer has a substantial business reason other than
providing additional remuneration to the employee. A statement that the
meals or lodging are not intended as remuneration is not sufficient to
establish that either meals or lodging are furnished for the employer's con-
venience.
(3) In the case of employees who receive remuneration in the form of
subsistence, such as groceries, staples, and fundamental shelter, the rea-
sonable fair market value of such subsistence shall be determined by the de-
partment.
SECTION 17. That Chapter 13, Title 72, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 72-1330A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
72-1330A. WORKPLACE MISCONDUCT. (1) "Workplace misconduct" means
conduct in connection with employment that willfully disregards the em-
ployer's interest, willfully violates the employer's reasonable rules, or
disregards a standard of behavior that the employer has a right to expect of
its employees.
(2) A claimant's conduct disregards a standard of behavior the employer
has a right to expect of its employees when the conduct falls below the stan-
dard of behavior expected by the employer and the employer's expectation was
objectively reasonable. There is no requirement that the claimant's conduct
be willful, intentional, or deliberate. The claimant's subjective state of
mind is not a relevant factor in determining workplace misconduct pursuant
to this subsection.
(3) An employer's expectation shall be considered objectively reason-
able when it is communicated to the employee or flows naturally from the em-
ployment relationship. An expectation that flows naturally need not be com-
municated to an employee to be considered objectively reasonable.
(4) Mere inefficiency, unsatisfactory conduct, inadvertencies, iso-
lated instances of ordinary negligence, good faith errors in judgment or
discretion, or failure to meet the performance expectations of the employer


because of inability or incapacity shall not be considered misconduct con-
nected with employment.
(5) Except as provided in section 72-1366(5), Idaho Code, conduct in-
volving personal, nonjob-related behavior occurring outside the workplace
shall not be considered workplace misconduct in connection with employment.
SECTION 18. That Section 72-1337, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1337. RECORDS AND REPORTS. (1) Each employer that is a "covered em-
ployer," as defined in section 72-1315, Idaho Code, shall complete and sub-
mit to the director an Idaho business registration form within six (6) months
of becoming a covered employer.
(2) Each employer, including those who are not covered employers, shall
keep accurate records, for such periods of time and containing such infor-
mation as the director may prescribe. Such records for a period of five (5)
years, including, without limitation:
(a) The full name and home address of the worker;
(b) The social security number of the worker;
(c) The place of work within the state;
(d) The date on which the worker was hired, rehired, or returned to work
after a temporary or partial layoff;
(e) The date on which the worker's employment was terminated;
(f) Whether the termination occurred by reason of:
(i) The worker's death;
(ii) The voluntary action by the worker and the reason given by the
worker; or
(iii) Discharge by the employer and the reason for the discharge;
(g) Wages paid for employment in each pay period and total wages for
all pay periods ending each quarter for the year, showing separately:
money wages, the cash value of other remuneration, and the amount of all
bonuses or commissions; and
(h) Amounts paid to a worker as an allowance or reimbursement for travel
and employee business expenses and the amounts of such expenditures ac-
tually incurred and accounted for.
(3) Employers that are liable to pay tax contributions, or that have
elected a cost reimbursement option in lieu of tax contributions, shall sub-
mit quarterly contribution reports in the form or medium designated by the
department.
(4)(a) Each contribution shall be accompanied by an employer's contri-
bution report. All contribution reports shall be filed electronically
with the department unless the employer has petitioned the department
in writing for a waiver and the department has granted a waiver allow-
ing the filing of a non-electronic contribution report. All contribu-
tion reports shall be in a form or medium prescribed and furnished or ap-
proved for such purpose by the department, giving such information as
may be required, including the number of individuals employed and wages
paid or payable to each. Every report must be signed, furnished, or ac-
knowledged by the covered employer or on the employer's behalf by a per-
son who has personal knowledge of the facts stated therein and who has
been authorized by the covered employer to submit the information.


(b) Each employer shall report all wages paid for services in covered
employment each calendar quarter. In the event a covered employer does
not pay wages during a calendar quarter, the employer shall file a quar-
terly report indicating that no wages were paid.
(c) The total wages and taxable wages shown on the contribution report
to be used in computing contributions due shall be reduced to the next
lower full dollar amount.
(d) An employer shall be covered for all four (4) quarters in the calen-
dar year in which the employer becomes a covered employer as well as for
all four (4) quarters in the succeeding calendar year. Employers are
not required to file quarterly reports until meeting the coverage cri-
teria pursuant to section 72-1315, Idaho Code. Upon becoming a covered
employer within a calendar year, the quarterly reports for the quarters
prior to the employer becoming covered shall be filed along with the
quarterly report for the quarter in which the employer became covered.
Quarterly reports for the periods subsequent to coverage shall be filed
when due after the end of each quarter.
(5)(a) Wages paid shall be assigned to the calendar quarter in which the
wages were:
(i) Actually paid to the employee in accordance with the em-
ployer's usual and customary payday as established by law or past
practice;
(ii) Due the employee in accordance with the employer's usual and
customary payday as established by law or past practice but not ac-
tually paid on such date because of circumstances beyond the con-
trol of the employer or the employee; or
(iii) Not paid on the usual or customary payday as established by
law or past practice but set apart on the employer's books as an
amount due and payable or otherwise recognized as a specific and
ascertainable amount due and payable to the worker in accordance
with an agreement or contract of hire under which services were
rendered.
(b) Payments to employees made prior to regular or established pay-
days shall be assignable and reportable during the quarter in which
they would have been paid unless a practice is established whereby all
employees or a class of employees are given an opportunity to take a reg-
ular advance against wages, which creates another customary payday.
(c) Amounts received as a result of labor relations awards or judg-
ments for back pay or for disputed wages constitute wages and shall be
reported in the quarter or quarters in which the award or judgment has
become final, after all appeals have been exhausted, or the quarter or
quarters to which the court assigns the wages, if different.
(d) Amounts awarded to the claimant as penalties or damages against the
employer, other than for lost wages, do not constitute wages.
(6) When wages paid cover services performed both in covered employment
and excluded employment, all employee wages shall be deemed to have been
earned in covered employment and shall be reported unless the employer's
records show the hours and wages for covered employment and excluded employ-
ment separately.


(7)(a) When remuneration paid includes payment in addition to wages for
services performed in covered employment, the employer's records shall
account for wages and other remuneration separately. When this distri-
bution is not shown on the records, the employee's entire remuneration
shall be deemed to be wages and shall be reported.
(b) When the amount paid to an employee includes remuneration for other
than personal services, such as equipment usage and travel costs, the
department shall determine the fair market value of the remuneration
for the employee's personal services. In making such determination,
the department shall consider the wages specified in the contract of
hire, the prevailing wages for similar work under comparable condi-
tions, and other pertinent factors. The wages so determined by the
department shall be reported by the employer.
(8) Each covered employer and any other employer requested by the de-
partment shall submit status reports on such form or online system as may be
prescribed and furnished by the director. The reports shall include such in-
formation as may be necessary for the department to make an initial or subse-
quent determination of status under this chapter and shall be signed by the
employer or the employer's representative duly authorized for such purpose.
(9)(a) To determine the taxable status of an employer, information
regarding the business activities of any person engaged in business in
Idaho shall be submitted to the department upon request, including,
without limitation, articles of incorporation, articles of organiza-
tion, minutes of boards of directors, financial reports, partnership
agreements, number of employees, wages paid, employment contracts,
income tax records, and any other records or other information that may
tend to establish such person's status.
(b) An employer shall be notified in writing of any determination as to
its liability for contributions or its status as a covered employer if a
formal determination was made after the employer questioned its status.
The determination shall become final if no appeal is taken to an appeals
examiner within fourteen (14) days of the determination pursuant to the
procedures set forth in section 72-1368, Idaho Code.
(c) The provisions of this section do not apply to any employer for whom
the services performed do not, by virtue of the provisions of section
72-1316, Idaho Code, constitute covered employment, except that the de-
partment may require any such employer to submit reports as provided in
this section.
(10) All persons, whether covered or not, shall make available to the
department all requested business records, including, without limitation,
journals, ledgers, time books, minute books, or any other records or infor-
mation that would tend to establish the existence of amounts paid for ser-
vices performed, whether or not in covered employment, and for information
necessary to assist in or enable collection efforts or any other investiga-
tions conducted by the department.
(11) Records shall be open to inspection and be subject to being copied
by the director at any reasonable time. The director, a member of the com-
mission, or an appeals examiner may require from any employer any sworn or
unsworn reports which are deemed necessary in the exercise of their duties.


(12) The department may commence an administrative proceeding for pur-
poses of establishing a tax liability or to otherwise enforce the provisions
of this chapter by issuing a determination at any time within five (5) years
from the due date of a quarterly report or the date a quarterly report is
filed, whichever is later, subject to tolling pursuant to section 72-1349,
Idaho Code.
(13) Covered employers shall furnish the department with all pertinent
data regarding their status when new or additional information is available.
(14)(a) All employers, including those who are not covered employers,
shall respond to department requests for the reasons for the separation
whenever the claimant:
(i) Left his employment voluntarily;
(ii) Was discharged from his employment due to workplace miscon-
duct;
(iii) Is unemployed due to a strike, lockout, or other labor dis-
pute;
(iv) Is not working due to a suspension; or
(v) Was separated for any other reason except lack of available
work.
(b) The employer's response and any supporting documentation must be
given by the employer or by a duly authorized representative of the
employer having personal knowledge of the facts concerning the sep-
aration. The employer shall provide to the department copies of any
documentation supporting its position by electronic media or mail.
SECTION 19. That Section 72-1342, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1342. DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION. (1) Employment security informa-
tion, as defined in section 74-106(7), Idaho Code, shall be exempt from dis-
closure as provided in chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, except that such in-
formation may be disclosed as is necessary for the proper administration of
programs under this chapter or may be made available to public officials for
use in the performance of official duties subject to such restrictions and
fees as the director may by rule prescribe.
(2) The director may shall by rule or department policy establish con-
fidentiality and disclosure procedures to comply with the requirements of 20
CFR 603 and the provisions of chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, including pro-
cedures that prescribe the form of written, informed consent by a person that
is adequate for disclosure of employment security information pertaining to
that person to a third party, as provided in section 74-106(7), Idaho Code,
and the security requirements and cost provisions that apply to such disclo-
sures.
SECTION 20. That Section 72-1349, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1349. PAYMENT OF CONTRIBUTIONS -- LIMITATION OF ACTIONS. (1) Con-
tributions shall be reported and paid to the department on taxable wages for
each calendar year equal to the amount determined in accordance with section
72-1350, Idaho Code. Contributions on wages paid to an individual under an-


other state unemployment insurance law, or paid by an employer's predecessor
during the calendar year, shall be counted in complying with this provision.
(2) Contributions shall accrue and become reportable and payable to the
department by each covered employer for each calendar quarter with respect
to wages for covered employment. Such contributions shall become due and
be paid by each covered employer to the director for the employment security
fund and shall not be deducted from the wages of individuals employed by such
employer. All moneys required to be paid by a covered employer pursuant to
this chapter shall immediately, upon becoming due and payable, become or be
deemed money belonging to the state, and every covered employer shall hold
or be deemed to hold said money separately, aside, or in trust from any other
funds, moneys or accounts, for the state of Idaho for payment in the manner
and at the times provided by law.
(3) The contributions reportable and payable to the department by each
covered employer, with respect to covered employment, and accruing in each
calendar quarter, shall be reported and paid to the department on or before
the last day of the month following the close of said calendar quarter. If
the normal due date falls on a weekend or holiday, the next business day shall
be the due date for contributions.
(4) Each amount shall be deemed to have been paid on the date that the
department receives payment thereof in cash or by check or other order for
the payment of money honored by the drawer on presentment. If sent through
the mail, the amount shall be deemed to have been paid as of the date mailed as
evidenced by the postmark on the envelope containing the contribution.
(5) Application of contribution payments shall be done in accordance
with department rule or policy.
(4) (6) The director may, for good cause shown by a covered employer,
extend the time for payment of his contributions or any part thereof, but no
such extension of time shall postpone the due date more than sixty (60) days.
Contributions with respect to which an extension of time for payment has been
granted shall be paid on or before the last day of the period of the exten-
sion.
(5) (7) Whenever it appears to be essential to the proper administra-
tion of this chapter that collection of the contributions of a covered em-
ployer must be made more often than quarterly, the director shall have au-
thority to demand payment of the contributions forthwith.
(6) (8) In accordance with rules the director may prescribe, any person
or persons entering into a formal contract with the state, any county, city,
town, school or irrigation district, or any quasi-public corporation of the
state, for the construction, alteration, or repair of any public building
or public work, the contract price of which exceeds the sum of one thousand
dollars ($1,000), may be required before commencing such work, to execute a
surety bond in an amount sufficient to cover contributions when due. If the
director, who shall approve said bond, determines that said bond has become
insufficient, he may require that a new bond be provided in the amount he di-
rects. Failure on the part of the employer covered by the bond to pay the full
amount of his contributions when due shall render the surety liable on said
bond as though the surety was the employer and subject to the other provi-
sions of this chapter.


(7) (9) In the payment of any contributions a fractional part of a dol-
lar shall be disregarded unless it amounts to fifty cents (50¢) or more, in
which case it shall be increased to one dollar ($1.00).
(8) (10) The director may commence administrative proceedings to en-
force the provisions of this section by issuing a determination at any time
within five (5) years of the due date of a quarterly report or the date a
quarterly report is filed, whichever is later. The limitation period of
this subsection (8) is tolled during any period in which the employer ab-
sconds from the state, during any period of the employer's concealment, or
during any period when the department's ability to commence administrative
proceedings to enforce the provisions of this section is stayed by legal
proceedings.
SECTION 21. That Section 72-1349B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
72-1349B. FINANCING OF BENEFITS PAYMENTS BY PROFESSIONAL EMPLOYERS
AND THEIR CLIENTS. (1) Nonprofit organizations and governmental entities
excepted. Financing of benefits for workers assigned by a professional em-
ployer to a nonprofit organization or a governmental entity shall be paid as
provided in section 72-1349A, Idaho Code. Financing of benefits for workers
assigned by a professional employer to any entity other than a nonprofit
organization or governmental entity shall be made in accordance with the
provisions of this section.
(2) A professional employer organization shall fully comply with the
requirements of chapter 24, title 44, Idaho Code, in order to be eligible for
any transfers of experience rating as allowed by this section.
(3) In order to effect a transfer of a client's experience rating into
the experience rating of a professional employer organization, both the
client and the professional employer organization shall jointly apply for
the transfer of the experience rating within the same time frames as required
of employers by section 72-1351(5), Idaho Code, from the date of the contract
entered into between the professional employer organization and the client
required by section 44-2405, Idaho Code. Failure to submit a timely joint
request for transfer of experience rating shall result in the professional
employer organization reporting wages for the client under the employer ac-
count number of the client.
(4) In the event that a client and a professional employer organization
jointly apply to transfer the experience rating of the client into that of
the professional employer organization, the client's entire experience rat-
ing and factors of experience rating shall be transferred into that of the
professional employer organization, and no partial transfers of experience
factors or the experience rating shall be allowed.
(5) If some of the client's workers are included in the professional em-
ployer organization arrangement and some are not included, and the profes-
sional employer organization and the client elect to report the workers in-
cluded in the professional employer organization arrangement under the em-
ployer account number of the client, then only one (1) quarterly report shall
be remitted to the department, which shall list or include all the client's
workers whether or not included in the professional employer organization
arrangement.


(6) If a client employer has employees, services, or employment, one
(1) or more of which do not independently meet the coverage or threshold
requirements necessary to constitute covered employment, such employees,
services, or employment shall nonetheless be deemed to meet the coverage
requirements of this chapter if, in combination with other employees, ser-
vices, or employment of such other employees of the professional employer
organization or any of its clients, such wages, services, or employees
jointly meet coverage requirements.
(2) (7) Liability for contributions. Unless a professional employer
meets the minimum requirements of this chapter, its client shall remain li-
able as a covered employer for any payments due under the provisions of this
chapter. During the term of a professional employer arrangement, a profes-
sional employer is liable for the payment of all moneys due pursuant to this
chapter as a result of wages paid to employees assigned to a client company,
except compensation paid to sole proprietors or partners in the client com-
pany.
(3) (8) Joint and several liability. A client is jointly and severally
liable for any unpaid moneys due under the provisions of this chapter from
the professional employer for wages paid to workers assigned to the client.
(4) (9) Reporting requirements. The professional employer shall re-
port and make all payments under its state employer account number. The
professional employer shall keep separate records and submit separate
quarterly wage reports for each of its clients. The professional employer
shall pay contributions for its clients collectively using the professional
employer's contribution rate unless it elects to pay the contribution for
certain clients individually in which instance the contribution shall be
paid using the individual client's contribution rate.
(10) To report the wages and employees covered by the professional
employer organization arrangement between a professional employer organ-
ization and client, professional employer organizations and their clients
shall make reports to the department in one (1) of the following ways, sub-
ject to any conditions in rules promulgated by the department:
(a) Report the workers included in the professional employer organiza-
tion arrangement under the employer account number of the professional
employer organization and transfer the rating of the client to the pro-
fessional employer organization; or
(b) Report the workers included in the professional employer organiza-
tion arrangement under the employer account number of the client with-
out an experience rating transfer.
(5) (11) Interested party. As between a professional employer and its
client, the professional employer company shall be deemed to be the inter-
ested party for purposes of section 72-1323, Idaho Code, and all proceedings
to determine rights to benefits under the provisions of this chapter.
(6) (12) Temporary workers. The provisions of this section do not apply
to an entity that provides temporary workers on a temporary help basis, pro-
vided that the entity is liable as the employer for all payments due under the
provisions of this chapter as a result of wages paid to those temporary work-
ers.
(7) (13) Rebuttable presumption. When a professional employer assigns
workers to only one (1) client and its affiliates, there is a rebuttable pre-


sumption that the client entered into a professional employer arrangement to
avoid calculation of the proper taxable wage rate. If the professional em-
ployer fails to rebut this presumption, the director, pursuant to section
72-1353, Idaho Code, shall issue an administrative determination of cover-
age holding the client to be the covered employer for purposes of this chap-
ter.
(8) (14) A client ceasing to pay wages. Whenever a client ceases to pay
wages, such client shall be subject to termination of its employer account
and experience rating records in the same manner as any other employer, in
accordance with the provisions of sections 72-1351 and 72-1352, Idaho Code.
If a client which that has ceased to pay wages subsequently becomes subject
to this chapter because it resumes paying wages, it will be assigned the
appropriate experience rate in accordance with the provisions of section
72-1351, Idaho Code.
(9) (15) Succession of experience factors. Whenever a professional em-
ployer arrangement is entered, the separate account and experience factors
of payroll and reserve shall be transferred to the professional employer for
the purpose of determining the professional employer's contribution rate to
be paid on behalf of the client. Upon the expiration or termination of the
professional employer arrangement, so much of the professional employer's
separate account and experience factors of payroll and reserve as is attrib-
utable to the client shall be transferred to the terminating client for the
purpose of determining the client's subsequent rate of contribution. In the
event the professional employer elects to pay the client's contribution sep-
arately as provided in subsection (4) (9) of this section, then the client's
experience factors of payroll and reserve shall remain with the client em-
ployer for the duration of the professional employer arrangement.
SECTION 22. That Section 72-1350, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1350. TAXABLE WAGE BASE AND TAXABLE WAGE RATES. (1) All remunera-
tion for personal services as defined in section 72-1328, Idaho Code, equal
to the average annual wage in covered employment for the penultimate cal-
endar year, rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100)
or the amount of taxable wage base specified in the federal unemployment
tax act, whichever is higher, shall be the taxable wage base for purposes of
this chapter. For the purpose of determining the taxable wage base under
this chapter, the average annual wage is computed by dividing that calendar
year's total wages in covered employment, excluding state government and
cost reimbursement employers, by the average number of workers in covered
employment for that calendar year as derived from data reported to the de-
partment by covered employers.
(2) Prior to December 31 of each year, the director shall determine the
taxable wage rates for the following calendar year for all covered employ-
ers, except cost reimbursement employers, in accordance with this section.
If the desired fund size multiplier set forth in subsection (3) of this
section is revised with an effective date that is prior to January 1 of the
following year, the director shall issue adjusted taxable wage rates as soon
as practicable and in accordance with the revised multiplier's effective
date. Employers shall receive a credit against future taxes under this act


for any overpayments resulting from tax payments made before the amended
taxable wage rates are adjusted.
(3) An average high-cost ratio shall be determined by calculating the
average of the three (3) highest benefit cost rates in the twenty (20) year
period ending with the preceding year. For the purposes of this section, the
"benefit cost rate" is the total annual benefits paid, including the state's
share of extended benefits but excluding the federal share of extended ben-
efits and cost-reimbursable benefits, divided by the total annual covered
wages excluding cost-reimbursable wages. The resulting average high-cost
ratio is multiplied by the desired fund size multiplier, and the result, for
the purposes of this section, is referred to as the "average high-cost mul-
tiple" (AHCM). The desired fund size multiplier shall decrease from one and
three-tenths (1.3) to one and two-tenths (1.2) on and after January 1, 2024.
(4) The fund balance ratio shall be determined by dividing the actual
balance of the employment security fund, section 72-1346, Idaho Code, and
the reserve fund, section 72-1347A, Idaho Code, on September 30 of the cur-
rent calendar year by the wages paid by all covered employers in Idaho, ex-
cept cost-reimbursement employers, in the preceding calendar year.
(5) The base tax rate shall be determined as follows:
(a) Divide the fund balance ratio by the AHCM;
(b) Subtract the quotient obtained from the calculation in paragraph
(a) of this subsection from the number two (2);
(c) Multiply the remainder obtained from the calculation in paragraph
(b) of this subsection by two and one-tenth percent (2.1%). The product
obtained from this calculation shall equal the base tax rate, provided
that the base tax rate shall not be less than six-tenths percent (0.6%)
and shall not exceed three and four-tenths percent (3.4%).
(6) The base tax rate calculated in accordance with subsection (5) of
this section shall be used to determine the taxable wage rate effective the
following calendar year for all covered employers except cost-reimbursement
employers as provided in subsections (7) and (8) of this section, except that
the base tax rate for calendar years 2022 and 2023 shall be equal to the base
tax rate calculated for calendar year 2021.
(7) Table of rate classes, tax factors and minimum and maximum taxable
wage rates:
Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits Eligible Employers
More Than Equal to Minimum Maximum
(% of or Less Than Taxable Taxable
Rate Taxable (% of Taxable Tax Wage Wage
Class Payroll) Payroll) Factor Rate Rate
1 -- 12 0.2857 0.180% 0.960%
2 12 24 0.4762 0.300% 1.600%
3 24 36 0.5714 0.360% 1.920%
4 36 48 0.6667 0.420% 2.240%
5 48 60 0.7619 0.480% 2.560%


6 60 72 0.8571 0.540% 2.880%
7 72 -- 0.9524 0.600% 3.200%
Standard-Rated Employers
Minimum Maximum
Taxable Taxable
Tax Wage Wage
Factor Rate Rate
1.000 1.000% 3.4%
Cumulative Taxable Payroll Limits Deficit Employers
More Than Equal to Minimum Maximum
(% of or Less Than Taxable Taxable
Rate Taxable (% of Taxable Tax Wage Wage
Class Payroll) Payroll) Factor Rate Rate
-1 -- 30 1.7143 1.080% 4.800%
-2 30 50 1.9048 1.200% 5.200%
-3 50 65 2.0952 1.320% 5.600%
-4 65 80 2.2857 1.440% 6.000%
-5 80 95 2.6667 1.680% 6.400%
-6 95 -- 2.6667 5.400% 6.800%
(8) Each covered employer, except cost-reimbursement employers, will
be assigned a taxable wage rate and a contribution rate as follows:
(a) Each employer, except standard-rated employers, will be assigned
to one (1) of the rate classes for eligible and deficit employers pro-
vided in subsection (7) of this section based on the employer's experi-
ence as determined under the provisions of sections 72-1319, 72-1319A,
72-1351 and 72-1351A, Idaho Code.
(b) For each rate class provided in subsection (7) of this section, the
department will multiply the base tax rate determined in accordance
with subsection (5) of this section by the tax factor listed for that
rate class in the table provided in subsection (7) of this section. The
product obtained from this calculation shall be the taxable wage rate
for employers assigned to that rate class, provided that the taxable
wage rate shall not be less than the minimum taxable wage rate assigned
to that rate class and shall not exceed the maximum taxable wage rate
assigned to that rate class in the table provided in subsection (7) of
this section.
(c) For standard-rated employers, the department will multiply the
base tax rate determined in accordance with subsection (5) of this
section by the tax factor listed for standard-rated employers in the
table provided in subsection (7) of this section. The product obtained
from this calculation shall be the taxable wage rate for standard-rated
employers, provided that the taxable wage rate shall not be less than
the minimum taxable wage rate assigned to standard-rated employers


and shall not exceed the maximum taxable wage rate assigned to stan-
dard-rated employers in the table provided in subsection (7) of this
section.
(d) Deficit employers who have been assigned a taxable wage rate from
deficit rate class 6 will be assigned contribution rates equal to their
taxable wage rate.
(e) All other eligible, standard-rated, and deficit employers will
be assigned contribution rates equal to ninety-seven percent (97%) of
their taxable wage rate. Provided however, that for each calendar year
a reserve tax is imposed pursuant to section 72-1347A, Idaho Code, the
contribution rates for employers assigned contribution rates pursuant
to this paragraph shall be eighty percent (80%) of their taxable wage
rate.
(9) Each employer shall be notified of his taxable wage rate as deter-
mined for any calendar year pursuant to this section and section 72-1351,
Idaho Code. Such determination shall become conclusive and binding upon
the employer, unless within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in
section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code, the employer files an application for re-
determination, setting forth his reasons therefor. Reconsideration shall
be limited to transactions occurring subsequent to any previous determina-
tion that has become final. The employer shall be promptly notified of the
redetermination, which shall become final unless an appeal is filed within
fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in section 72-1368(5), Idaho
Code. Proceedings on the appeal shall be in accordance with the provisions
of section 72-1361, Idaho Code.
SECTION 23. That Section 72-1351, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1351. EXPERIENCE RATING AND VOLUNTARY TRANSFERS OF EXPERIENCE RAT-
ING ACCOUNTS. (1) Subject to the other provisions of this chapter, each eli-
gible and deficit employer's, except cost reimbursement employers, taxable
wage rate shall be determined in the manner set forth in this subsection for
each calendar year:
(a)(i) Each eligible employer shall be given an "experience fac-
tor" which shall be the ratio of excess of contributions over ben-
efits paid on the employer's account since December 31, 1939, to
his average annual taxable payroll rounded to the next lower dol-
lar amount for the four (4) fiscal years immediately preceding the
computation date, except that when an employer first becomes eli-
gible, his "experience factor" will be computed on his average an-
nual taxable payroll for the two (2) fiscal years or more, but not
to exceed four (4) fiscal years, immediately preceding the compu-
tation date. The computation of such "experience factor" shall be
to six (6) decimal places.
(ii) Each deficit employer shall be given a "deficit experience
factor" which shall be the ratio of excess of benefits paid on the
employer's account over contributions since December 31, 1939, to
his average annual taxable payroll rounded to the next lower dol-
lar amount for one (1) or more fiscal years, but not to exceed four
(4) fiscal years, for which he had covered employment ending on


the computation date; provided, however, that any employer who, on
any computation date has a "deficit experience factor" for the pe-
riod immediately preceding such computation date but who has filed
all reports, paid all contributions and penalties due on or before
the cutoff date, and has during the last four (4) fiscal years paid
contributions at a rate of not less than the standard rate applica-
ble for each such year and in excess of benefits charged to his ex-
perience rating account during such years, shall have any balance
of benefits charged to his account, which on the computation date
immediately preceding such four (4) fiscal years was in excess of
contributions paid, deleted from his account, and the excess ben-
efits so deleted shall not be considered in the computation of his
taxable wage rate for the rate years following such four (4) fiscal
years. For the rate year following such computation date, he shall
be given the standard rate for that year.
(iii) In the event an employer's coverage has been terminated be-
cause he has ceased to do business or because he has not had covered
employment for a period of four (4) years, and if said employer
thereafter becomes a covered employer, he will be considered as
though he were a new employer, and he shall not be credited with his
previous experience under this chapter for the purpose of comput-
ing any future "experience factor."
(iv) Benefits paid to a claimant whose employment terminated be-
cause the claimant's employer was called to active military duty
shall not be used as a factor in determining the taxable wage rate
of that employer.
(b) Schedules shall be prepared listing all eligible employers in in-
verse numerical order of their experience factors, and all deficit em-
ployers in numerical order of their deficit experience factors. There
shall be listed on such schedules for each such employer in addition to
the experience factor: (i) the amount of his taxable payroll for the
fiscal year ending on the computation date, and (ii) a cumulative total
consisting of the sum of such employer's taxable payroll for the fiscal
year ending on the computation date and the corresponding taxable pay-
rolls for all other employers preceding him on such schedules.
(c) The cumulative taxable payroll amounts listed on the schedules pro-
vided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be segregated into
groups whose limits shall be those set out in the table provided in sec-
tion 72-1350(7), Idaho Code. Each of such groups shall be identified
by the rate class number listed in the table which represents the per-
centage limits of each group. Each employer on the schedules shall be
assigned a taxable wage rate in accordance with section 72-1350, Idaho
Code.
(d)(i) If the grouping of rate classes requires the inclusion of
exactly one-half (1/2) of an employer's taxable payroll, the em-
ployer shall be assigned the lower of the two (2) rates designated
for the two (2) classes in which the halves of his taxable payroll
are so required.
(ii) If the group of rate classes requires the inclusion of a por-
tion other than exactly one-half (1/2) of an employer's taxable


payroll, the employer shall be assigned the rate designated for
the class in which the greater part of his taxable payroll is so re-
quired.
(iii) If one (1) or more employers on the schedules have experi-
ence factors identical to that of the last employer included in a
particular rate class, all such employers shall be included in and
assigned the taxable wage rate specified for such class, notwith-
standing the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(e) If the taxable payroll amount or the experience factor or both
such taxable payroll amount and experience factor of any eligible or
deficit employer listed on the schedules is changed, the employer shall
be placed in that position on the schedules which he would have occu-
pied had his taxable payroll amount and/or experience factor as changed
been used in determining his position in the first instance, but such
change shall not affect the position or rate classification of any other
employer listed on the schedules and shall not affect the rate determi-
nation for previous years.
(2) For experience rating purposes, all previously accumulated benefit
charges to covered employers' accounts, except cost reimbursement employ-
ers, shall not be changed except as provided in this chapter. Benefits paid
prior to June 30 shall, as of June 30 of each year preceding the calendar year
for which a covered employer's taxable wage rate is effective, be charged to
the account of the covered employer, except cost reimbursement employers,
who paid the largest individual amount of base period wages as shown on the
determination used as the basis for the payment of such benefits, except that
no charge shall be made to the account of such covered employer with respect
to benefits paid under the following situations:
(a) If paid to a worker who terminated his services voluntarily without
good cause attributable to such covered employer, with good cause but
for reasons not attributable to such covered employer, or who had been
discharged for workplace misconduct in connection with such services;
(b) If paid in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1368(10),
Idaho Code, and the decision to pay benefits is subsequently reversed;
(c) For that portion of benefits paid to multistate claimants pursuant
to section 72-1344, Idaho Code, which exceeds the amount of benefits
that would have been charged had only Idaho wages been used in paying the
claim;
(d) If paid in accordance with the extended benefit program triggered
by either national or state indicators;
(e) If paid to a worker who continues to perform services for such cov-
ered employer without a reduction in his customary work schedule, and
who is eligible to receive benefits due to layoff or a reduction in earn-
ings from another employer; or
(f) If paid to a worker who turns down an offer of suitable work because
of participation in a job training program pursuant to the requirements
of section 72-1366(8), Idaho Code.
(3) A covered employer whose experience rating account is chargeable,
as prescribed by this section, is an interested party as defined in sec-
tion 72-1323, Idaho Code. A determination of chargeability shall become
final unless, within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in section


72-1368(5), Idaho Code, an appeal is filed by an interested party with the
department in accordance with the department's rules. Appeal proceedings
shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1361, Idaho Code.
(4)(a) An experience rating record shall be maintained for each covered
employer. The record shall be credited with all contributions which the
covered employer has paid for covered employment prior to the cutoff
date, pursuant to the provisions of this and preceding acts, and which
covered employment occurred prior to the computation date. The record
shall also be charged with the amount of benefits paid which are charge-
able to the covered employer's account as provided by the appropriate
provisions of the employment security law and regulations thereunder
in effect at the time such benefits were paid. Nothing in this section
shall be construed to grant any covered employer or individual in his
service a priority with respect to any claim or right because of amounts
paid by such covered employer into the employment security fund.
(b) Except those meeting the requirements of section 72-1349B, Idaho
Code, each person or entity paying wages directly, or indirectly
through arrangements in which payroll is consolidated for multiple per-
sons or entities, shall maintain separate records and shall report the
wages in accordance with this chapter. The wages for one (1) person or
entity may not be reported under the assigned record of another, even
where the people or entities are related.
(5)(a) Whenever any individual or type of organization, whether or not
a covered employer within the meaning of section 72-1315, Idaho Code,
in any manner succeeds to, or acquires all or substantially all, of the
business of an employer who at the time of acquisition was a covered
employer, and in respect to whom the director finds that the business
of the predecessor is continued solely by the successor, the separate
experience rating account of the predecessor shall, upon the joint ap-
plication of the predecessor and the successor within the one hundred
eighty (180) days after such acquisition and approval by the director,
be transferred to the successor employer for the purpose of determining
such successor's liability and taxable wage rate, and any successor who
was not an employer on the date of acquisition shall, as of such date,
become a covered employer as defined in this chapter. Such one hundred
eighty (180) day period may be extended at the discretion of the direc-
tor.
(b) Whenever any individual or type of organization, whether or not a
covered employer within the meaning of section 72-1315, Idaho Code, in
any manner succeeds to, or acquires, part of the business of an employer
who at the time of acquisition was a covered employer, and such portion
of the business is continued by the successor, so much of the separate
experience rating account of the predecessor as is attributable to the
portion of the business transferred, as determined on a pro rata basis
in the same ratio that the wages of covered employees properly allocable
to the transferred portion of the business bears to the payroll of the
predecessor in the last four (4) completed calendar quarters immedi-
ately preceding the date of transfer, shall, upon the joint application
of the predecessor and the successor within one hundred eighty (180)
days after such acquisition and approval by the director, be trans-


ferred to the successor employer for the purpose of determining such
successor's liability and taxable wage rate, and any successor who was
not an employer on the date of acquisition shall, as of such date, become
a covered employer as defined in this chapter. Such one hundred eighty
(180) day period may be extended at the discretion of the director.
(c)(i) If the successor was a covered employer prior to the date
of the acquisition of all or a part of the predecessor's business,
his taxable wage rate, effective the first day of the calendar
quarter immediately following the date of acquisition, shall be a
newly computed rate based on the combined experience of the prede-
cessor and successor, the resulting rate remaining in effect the
balance of the rate year.
(ii) If the successor was not a covered employer prior to the date
of the acquisition of all or a part of the predecessor's business,
his rate shall be the rate applicable to the predecessor with re-
spect to the period immediately preceding the date of acquisition,
but if there were was more than one (1) predecessor, the succes-
sor's rate shall be a newly computed rate based on the combined ex-
perience of the predecessors, becoming effective immediately af-
ter the date of acquisition, and shall remain in effect the balance
of the rate year.
(d) For purposes of this section, an employer's experience rating ac-
count shall consist of the actual contribution, benefit and taxable
payroll experience of the employer and any amounts due from the employer
under this chapter. When a transferred experience rating account
includes amounts due from the employer under this chapter, both the
predecessor employer and the successor employer shall be jointly and
severally liable for those amounts.
SECTION 24. That Section 72-1351A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
72-1351A. MANDATORY TRANSFERS OF EXPERIENCE RATING ACCOUNTS AND FED-
ERAL CONFORMITY PROVISIONS REGARDING TRANSFERS OF EXPERIENCE AND ASSIGNMENT
OF RATES. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the following
shall apply regarding transfers of experience and assignment of rates:
(1)(a) If a covered employer transfers its trade or business, or a por-
tion thereof, to another employer, whether or not a covered employer
within the meaning of section 72-1315, Idaho Code, and, at the time of
the transfer, there is substantially common ownership, management or
control of the two (2) employers, then the experience rating account
attributable to the transferred trade or business shall be transferred
to the employer to whom such business is so transferred. The rates of
both employers shall be recalculated using the methods provided in sec-
tion 72-1351(5)(b) and either (c)(i) or (c)(ii), Idaho Code. Whenever
such mandatory transfer involves only a portion of the experience rat-
ing record, and the predecessor or successor employers fail within ten
(10) days after notice to supply the required payroll information, the
transfer may be based on estimates of the allocable payrolls.
(i) For partial transfers of an experience rating record, the pro
rata share of the experience rate to be transferred shall be com-


puted based on the four (4) most recently completed quarters re-
ported by the predecessor employer prior to the date of acquisi-
tion or change in entity.
(ii) When a total transfer of experience rating record has been
completed and the predecessor employer continues to have employ-
ment in connection with the liquidation of his business, the pre-
decessor employer shall continue to pay contributions at the as-
signed rate for the period of liquidation but not beyond the bal-
ance of the rate year.
(iii) In determining whether the ownership or management or con-
trol of a successor employer is substantially the same as the own-
ership or management or control of the predecessor employer, fac-
tors to be considered include, without limitation, the extent of
policy-making authority, the involvement in daily management of
operations, the supervision over the workforce, the percentage of
ownership of shares or assets, and the involvement on boards of di-
rectors or other controlling bodies.
(iv) A successor employer may use wages paid by the predecessor
employer to arrive at the wage base for purposes of calculating
taxable wages only when the experience rate of a predecessor em-
ployer has been transferred to a successor employer.
(b) If, following a transfer of experience under paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the director determines that a substantial purpose of the
transfer of the trade or business was to obtain a reduced liability for
contributions, then the experience rating accounts of the employers in-
volved shall be combined into a single account and a single rate shall be
assigned to such account.
(2) Whenever a person who is not a covered employer under this chapter
at the time such person acquires the trade or business of a covered employer,
the experience rating account of the acquired business shall not be trans-
ferred to such person if the director finds that such person acquired the
business primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower rate of contribu-
tions. Instead, such person shall be assigned the standard rate for new
employers under section 72-1350, Idaho Code. In determining whether the
trade or business was acquired primarily for the purpose of obtaining a lower
rate of contributions, the director shall use objective factors which may
include, but are not limited to, the cost of acquiring the business, whether
the person continued the business enterprise of the acquired business, how
long such business enterprise was continued, or whether a substantial number
of new employees were hired for performance of duties unrelated to the busi-
ness activity conducted prior to acquisition.
(3)(a) It shall be a violation of this section if a person:
(i) Makes any false statement to the department when the maker
knows the statement to be false or acts with deliberate ignorance
of or reckless disregard for the truth of the matter or willfully
fails to disclose a material fact to the department in connection
with the transfer of a trade or business;
(ii) Prepares any false or antedated report, form, book, paper,
record, written instrument, or other matter or thing in connection


with the transfer of a trade or business with the intent to submit
it or allow it to be submitted to the department as genuine or true;
(iii) Knowingly violates or attempts to violate subsection (1) or
(2) of this section or any other provision of this chapter related
to determining the assignment of a contribution rate or an experi-
ence rate; or
(iv) Knowingly advises another person in a way that results in a
violation or an attempted violation of subsection (1) or (2) of
this section or any other provision of this chapter related to de-
termining the assignment of a contribution rate or an experience
rate.
(b) If a person commits any of the acts described in paragraph (a) of
this subsection, the person shall be subject to the following penal-
ties:
(i) If the person is a covered employer, a civil money penalty of
ten percent (10%) of such person's taxable wages for the four (4)
completed consecutive quarters preceding the violation shall be
imposed for such year and said penalty shall be deposited in the
state employment security administrative and reimbursement fund
as established by section 72-1348, Idaho Code.
(ii) If the person is not a covered employer, such person shall
be subject to a civil money penalty of not more than five thousand
dollars ($5,000) for each violation. Any such penalty shall be de-
posited in the state employment security administrative and reim-
bursement fund as established by section 72-1348, Idaho Code.
(4) Every person who knowingly makes any false statement to the depart-
ment or knowingly fails to disclose a material fact to the department in con-
nection with the transfer of a trade or business, or knowingly prepares any
false or antedated report, form, book, paper, record, written instrument, or
other matter or thing in connection with the transfer of a trade or business
with the intent to submit it or allow it to be submitted to the department
as genuine or true, or knowingly violates or attempts to violate subsection
(1) or (2) of this section or any other provision of this chapter related to
determining the assignment of a contribution rate or an experience rate, or
knowingly advises another person to act in a way that results in a violation
or an attempted violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section or any
other provision of this chapter related to determining the assignment of a
contribution rate or an experience rate, shall be guilty of a felony punish-
able as provided in section 18-112, Idaho Code.
(5) For purposes of this section:
(a) An employer's experience rating account shall consist of
"Experience rating account" means the actual contribution, benefit and
taxable payroll experience of the employer and any amounts due from the
employer under this chapter. When a transferred experience rating ac-
count includes amounts due from the employer under this chapter, both
the predecessor employer and the successor employer shall be jointly
and severally liable for those amounts.
(b) "Knowingly" means having actual knowledge of or acting with delib-
erate ignorance of or reckless disregard for the prohibition involved.


(c) "Person" has the meaning given such term by section 7701(a)(1) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. 7701(a)(1)).
(d) A "transfer of a trade or business" occurs whenever a person in any
manner acquires or succeeds to all or a portion of a trade or business.
Factors the department may consider when determining whether a transfer
of a trade or business has occurred include, but are not limited to, the
following:
(i) Whether the successor continued the business enterprise of
the acquired business;
(ii) Whether the successor purchased, leased or assumed ma-
chinery and manufacturing equipment, office equipment, business
premises, the business or corporate name, inventories, a covenant
not to compete or a list of customers;
(iii) Continuity of business relationships with third parties
such as vendors, suppliers and subcontractors;
(iv) A transfer of good will;
(v) A transfer of accounts receivable;
(vi) Possession and use of the predecessor's sales correspon-
dence; and
(vii) Whether the employees remained the same.
(e) "Trade or business" includes, but is not limited to, the employer's
workforce. The transfer of some or all of an employer's workforce to
another employer shall be considered a transfer of a trade or business
when, as the result of such transfer, the transferring employer no
longer performs trade or business with respect to the transferred work-
force, and such trade or business is performed by the employer to whom
the workforce is transferred.
(f) "Violates or attempts to violate" includes, but is not limited to,
intent to evade, misrepresentation or willful nondisclosure.
(6) The director shall establish procedures to identify the transfer or
acquisition of a business for purposes of this section.
(7) This section shall be interpreted and applied in such a manner as to
meet the minimum requirements contained in any guidance or regulations is-
sued by the United States department of labor.
(8) Administrative determinations issued pursuant to this section
shall become final unless, within fourteen (14) days after notice as pro-
vided in section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code, an appeal is filed with the depart-
ment in accordance with the department's rules. Appeal proceedings shall be
in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1361, Idaho Code.
SECTION 25. That Section 72-1352A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
72-1352A. CORPORATE OFFICERS -- EXEMPTION FROM COVERAGE -- NOTIFICA-
TION -- REINSTATEMENT. (1) A corporation that is a public company, other than
those covered in sections 72-1316A, 72-1322D and 72-1349C, Idaho Code, may
elect to exempt from coverage pursuant to this chapter any bona fide corpo-
rate officer who is voluntarily elected or voluntarily appointed in accor-
dance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, is a
shareholder of the corporation, exercises substantial control in the daily


management of the corporation and whose primary responsibilities do not in-
clude the performance of manual labor.
(2) A corporation that is not a public company, other than those cov-
ered in sections 72-1316A, 72-1322D and 72-1349C, Idaho Code, may elect to
exempt from coverage pursuant to this chapter any bona fide corporate offi-
cer, without regard to the corporate officer's performance of manual labor,
if the corporate officer is a shareholder of the corporation, voluntarily
agrees to be exempted from coverage and exercises substantial control in the
daily management of the corporation.
(3) For purposes of this section, a "public company" is a corporation
that has a class of shares registered with the federal securities and ex-
change commission pursuant to section 12 or 15 of the securities and exchange
act of 1934 or section 8 of the investment company act of 1940, or any succes-
sor statute.
(4) To make the election, a corporation with qualifying corporate offi-
cers pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section must register with the
department each qualifying corporate officer it elects to exempt from cover-
age. The registration must be in a format prescribed by the department and be
signed and dated by the corporate officer being exempted from coverage. Reg-
istration forms received and approved by the department by March 31 of the
first year of the election shall be effective January 1 of that year and shall
remain in effect for at least two (2) consecutive calendar years.
(5) A newly formed corporation with qualifying corporate officers
pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall register with the
department each corporate officer it elects to exempt within forty-five (45)
calendar days after submitting its Idaho business registration form to the
department as required by section 72-1337, Idaho Code. The registration
must be in a format prescribed by the department and be signed and dated by
the corporate officer being exempted from coverage. Registration forms re-
ceived and approved by the department shall become effective as of the date
the Idaho business registration form was submitted to the department and
shall remain in effect for at least two (2) consecutive calendar years.
(6) A corporation may elect to reinstate coverage for one (1) or more
corporate officers previously exempted pursuant to this section. Rein-
statement requires written notice from the corporation to the department in
a format prescribed by the department. Reinstatement requests received by
the department on or before December 15 shall become effective the first day
of the calendar year following the end of the exemption's two (2) year effec-
tive date. Coverage shall not be reinstated retroactively. Reinstatement
requests received by the department on or before March 31 shall become effec-
tive January 1 of the current calendar year if at least two (2) consecutive
calendar years have passed since the date of the exemption.
(7) A corporate officer's exemption is in effect until revoked or ter-
minated upon the corporate officer's failure to satisfy the election crite-
ria. It is the responsibility of the corporation to notify the department in
writing in a format required by the department when an exempt corporate offi-
cer no longer meets the election criteria. A corporation is responsible for
any taxes, penalties, and interest due after the date the exemption is termi-
nated or should have been terminated.
(8) For purposes of this chapter:


(a) "Bona fide corporate officer" means an individual empowered in good
faith by stockholders or directors, in accordance with the corpora-
tion's articles of incorporation or bylaws, to discharge the duties of a
corporate officer.
(b) A person exercises substantial control in the daily management of
the corporation when the person makes managerial decisions for the cor-
poration, including, without limitation, the authority to hire and fire
and to direct other's activities in the corporation and the responsi-
bility to account for and pay taxes or debts incurred by the corpora-
tion.
SECTION 26. That Section 72-1357, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1357. ADJUSTMENTS AND REFUNDS. (1) If any person shall make appli-
cation for a refund or credit of any amounts paid under this chapter, the
director shall, upon determining that such amounts or any portion thereof
was erroneously collected, either allow credit therefor, without interest,
in connection with subsequent payments, or shall refund from the fund in
which the erroneous payment was deposited, without interest, the amount
erroneously paid.
(2) An employer submitting an erroneous report of employee wages re-
sulting in payment of unearned unemployment insurance benefits shall have
said benefit payments subtracted from any refund due that employer if such
employer benefited from the unearned benefit payments.
(2) (3) No refund or credit shall be allowed unless an application
therefor is made on or before whichever of the following dates is later:
(a) One (1) year from the date on which such payment was made; or
(b) Three (3) years from the last day of the calendar quarter with re-
spect to which such payment was made. For a like cause and within the
same period a refund may be so made, or credit allowed, on the initia-
tive of the director. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to au-
thorize any refund or credit of moneys due and payable under the law and
regulations in effect at the time such moneys were paid.
(3) (4) In the event that any application for refund or credit is re-
jected in whole or in part, a written notice of rejection shall be forwarded
to the applicant. Within fourteen (14) days after notice as provided in sec-
tion 72-1368(5), Idaho Code, the applicant may appeal to the director for a
hearing with regard to the rejection, setting forth the grounds for such ap-
peal. Proceedings on the appeal shall be in accordance with the provisions
of section 72-1361, Idaho Code.
(5) The department may on its own initiative refund or credit overpay-
ments on employer accounts without written application by the employer.
(6) The department may establish a value under which no delinquency,
refund, or credit shall be maintained or issued on the account.
SECTION 27. That Section 72-1365, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


72-1365. PAYMENT OF BENEFITS. (1) Benefits shall be paid from the em-
ployment security fund to any unemployed individual who is eligible for ben-
efits as provided by section 72-1366, Idaho Code.
(2) Periodically, the department of health and welfare, bureau of child
support enforcement services, shall forward to the director a list contain-
ing the full name and social security number of persons from whom it is seek-
ing child support. The director shall match the names and social security
numbers on the list with its records of individuals eligible for benefits,
and shall notify the department of health and welfare, bureau of child sup-
port enforcement services, of the address and amount of benefits due each in-
dividual.
(a) Voluntary withholding. The director shall deduct and withhold from
any benefits payable to an individual that owes child support obliga-
tions as defined under paragraph (g) of this subsection, the amount
specified by the individual to the director to be deducted and withheld
under this subsection, if paragraph (b) of this subsection below is not
applicable.
(b) Involuntary withholding. The director shall withhold any bene-
fits of any person within the limits established by section 11-207,
Idaho Code, upon notification and order by the department of health and
welfare, bureau of child support enforcement services, to collect any
delinquent child support obligation which that has been assigned on
behalf of any individual to the department of health and welfare under
sections 56-203A and 56-203B, Idaho Code, or a child support obligation
which that the department seeks to collect pursuant to chapter 12, title
7, Idaho Code. The set-off or withholding of any benefits of a claimant
shall become final after the following conditions have been met:
(i) The child support payment to be set-off or withheld is a child
support obligation established by order as defined in section
7-1202, Idaho Code.
(ii) All liabilities owed by reason of the provisions of section
72-1369, Idaho Code, have been collected by the director.
(iii) Notice of the set-off or withholding has been mailed by
registered or certified mail from the department of health and
welfare, bureau of child support enforcement services, to the
claimant-obligor at the address listed on the claim. Within
fourteen (14) days after such notice has been mailed (not count-
ing Saturday, Sunday, or state holidays as the 14th day), the
claimant-obligor may file a protest in writing, requesting a hear-
ing before the department of health and welfare to determine his
liability to the obligee. The hearing, if requested, shall be held
within thirty-five (35) days from the date of the initial notice to
the claimant-obligor of the proposed set-off. No issues at that
hearing may be considered which have been litigated previously.
The department of health and welfare shall issue its findings and
decision either at the hearing or within ten (10) days of the hear-
ing by mail to the claimant-obligor.
(iv) In its decision, the department of health and welfare may
order the withholding and set-off of any subsequent benefits which
may be due the claimant-obligor until the debt for which set-off


is sought and any additional debts which that are incurred by the
claimant's failure to make additional periodic payments based
upon on the same court order are satisfied.
(c) Any amount deducted and withheld under paragraph (a) or (b) of this
subsection shall be paid by the director to the appropriate state or lo-
cal child support enforcement services agency.
(d) Any amount deducted and withheld under paragraph (a) or (b) of this
subsection shall for all purposes be treated as if it were paid to the
individual as benefits and paid by such individual to the state or local
child support enforcement services agency in satisfaction of the indi-
vidual's child support obligations.
(e) For purposes of paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection, the
term "benefits" means any compensation payable under this chapter, in-
cluding amounts payable by the director pursuant to an agreement under
any federal law providing for compensation, assistance, or allowances
with respect to unemployment.
(f) This section applies only if appropriate arrangements have been
made for reimbursement by the state or local child support enforcement
services agency for the administrative costs incurred by the director
under the provisions of this section which that are attributable to
child support obligations being enforced by the state or local child
support enforcement services agency.
(g) The term "child support obligation" is defined for the purposes of
these provisions as including only an obligation which that is being en-
forced pursuant to a plan described in section 454 of the social secu-
rity act which that has been approved by the secretary of health and hu-
man services under part D of title IV of the social security act.
(h) The term "state or local child support enforcement services agency"
as used in these provisions means any agency of this state or a political
subdivision thereof operating pursuant to a plan described in paragraph
(g) of this subsection.
(3) Benefits shall be paid only to the extent that moneys are available
for such payments in the employment security fund.
(4) Benefits shall be paid not less frequently than biweekly.
(5) Upon request, the department of health and welfare, bureau of child
support enforcement services, shall make the procedures established in this
section for collecting child support available to county prosecuting attor-
neys. The provisions of this subsection apply only if appropriate arrange-
ments have been made for reimbursement by the requesting prosecuting attor-
ney for the administrative costs incurred by the bureau, which are attribut-
able to the request.
(6)(a) An individual filing a new claim for benefits shall, at the time
of filing such claim, be advised that:
(i) Benefits are subject to federal and state tax and require-
ments exist pertaining to estimated tax payments;
(ii) The individual may elect to have federal income tax deducted
and withheld from the individual's benefits at the amount speci-
fied in the federal internal revenue code; Internal Revenue Code;
and


(iii) The individual shall be permitted to may change a previously
elected withholding status at least once during each benefit year.
(b) Amounts deducted and withheld from benefits shall remain in the
unemployment employment security fund until transferred to the taxing
authority as a payment of income tax.
(c) The director shall follow all procedures specified by the United
States department of labor and the federal internal revenue service
pertaining to the deducting and withholding of income tax.
(d) Amounts shall not be deducted and withheld under this subsection
until the following deductions are made and withheld in the following
order:
(i) First, amounts owed for overpayments of benefits deducted
and withheld pursuant to the provisions of section 72-1369, Idaho
Code;
(ii) Second, amounts owed for child support obligations deducted
and withheld pursuant to the provisions of subsection (2) of this
section.
(e) At the director's discretion, the director may promulgate rules al-
lowing individuals to elect to have state income tax deducted and with-
held from the individual's payment of benefits.
SECTION 28. That Section 72-1366, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1366. PERSONAL ELIGIBILITY CONDITIONS. The personal eligibility
conditions of a benefit claimant are that:
(1) The claimant shall have made a claim for benefits, and provided all
necessary information pertinent to eligibility, and demonstrated that he is
eligible for benefits and not disqualified; except that in the case of dis-
charges from employment, the employer shall have the burden of demonstrating
the discharge was for workplace misconduct.
(2) The claimant shall have registered for work and thereafter reported
to a job service office or other agency in a manner prescribed by the direc-
tor.
(3) The claimant shall have met the minimum wage requirements in his
base period as provided in section 72-1367, Idaho Code.
(4)(a) During the whole of any week with respect to which he claims ben-
efits or credit to his waiting period, the claimant was:
(i) Able to work,;
(ii) aAvailable for suitable work, and;
(iii) Actively seeking work by conducting no fewer than five (5)
work search actions per week; provided, however, that no claimant
shall be considered ineligible for failure to comply with the pro-
visions of this subsection paragraph if:
1. Such failure is due to a claimant's illness or disabil-
ity of no more than four (4) weeks that arises after filing
a claim, provided that during such illness or disability,
the claimant does not refuse or miss suitable work that
would have provided wages greater than one-half (1/2) of the
claimant's weekly benefit amount; or


2. Such failure is due to compelling personal circum-
stances, provided that such failure does not exceed a minor
portion of the claimant's workweek and during which time
the claimant does not refuse or miss suitable work that
would have provided wages greater than one-half (1/2) of the
claimant's weekly benefit amount; and
(ii) (iv) Living in a state, territory, or country that is in-
cluded in the interstate benefit payment plan or that is a party to
an agreement with the United States or the director with respect to
unemployment insurance.
(b) An action shall be considered an acceptable work search action pur-
suant to paragraph (a) of this subsection if it consists of one (1) or
more of the following actions in any week:
(i) Completing an online or in-person job search workshop;
(ii) Completing a job search assessment, including but not lim-
ited to a personality, skills, or interests assessment;
(iii) Completing career direction research or work such as a job
search plan or job search counseling;
(iv) Completing job search branding and marketing activities such
as completing a resume, cover letter, master application, eleva-
tor pitch, LinkedIn profile, or uploading a completed resume to a
job board allowing visibility to employers;
(v) Completing an online or in-person mock interview;
(vi) Taking a civil service exam;
(vii) Submitting a resume to an employer;
(viii) Completing and submitting a job application to an employer;
(ix) Attending and completing an interview or skills test with an
employer; or
(x) Attending a job fair.
(c) If a claimant who is enrolled in an approved job training course
pursuant to subsection (8) of this section fails to attend or otherwise
participate in the job training course during any week with respect to
which he claims benefits or credit to his waiting period, the claimant
shall be ineligible for that week if he was not able to work nor avail-
able for suitable work, to be determined as follows: The claimant shall
be ineligible unless he is making satisfactory progress in the training
and his failure to attend or otherwise participate was due to:
(i) The claimant's illness or disability that occurred after he
had filed a claim and the claimant missed fewer than one-half (1/2)
of the classes available to him that week; or
(ii) Compelling personal circumstances, provided that the
claimant missed fewer than one-half (1/2) of the classes available
to him that week.
(d) A claimant shall not be denied regular unemployment benefits under
any provision of this chapter relating to availability for work, active
search for work or refusal to accept work solely because the claimant is
seeking only part-time work if the department determines that a major-
ity of the weeks of work in the claimant's base period were for less than
full-time work. For the purpose of this subsection, "seeking only part-
time work" is defined as seeking work that has comparable hours to the


claimant's part-time work experience in the base period, except that a
claimant must be available for at least twenty (20) hours of work per
week.
(e) A claimant must seek work as directed by the department. A claimant
must meet the requirements of the code to which the claimant is as-
signed. Failure to comply with work-seeking requirements will result
in a denial of benefits. For the purpose of administering the work
search requirements of this subsection and subsection (6) of this
section, a claimant will be coded according to his attachment to an em-
ployer or industry, as follows:
(i) Attached. A claimant who has a firm attachment to an em-
ployer, industry, or union, or who is temporarily or seasonally
unemployed, and expects to return to his former job or employer
in a reasonable length of time not to exceed sixteen (16) weeks,
provided the claimant maintains reasonable contact with his em-
ployer. If during the sixteen (16) weeks the claimant returns to
work temporarily for the job attached employer, the claimant's
period of job attachment will be extended by one (1) week for each
week of verified full-time employment as defined by this chapter;
(ii) Work-seeking. A claimant who possesses marketable skills in
an occupation, but has no immediate prospects for reemployment,
and whose employment expectations, wages, hours, and other condi-
tions of employment are realistic in relation to the normal labor
market supply and demand in his area of availability; or
(iii) Approved training. A claimant who is assigned to a training
course under the provisions of subsection (8) of this section.
(f) A claimant must provide or be capable of obtaining a license or per-
mit if required by law for performance of the work.
(g) A claimant must apply for and accept a lower or beginning pay rate
for employment if he has no prospects for a better-paying job in the lo-
cality.
(h) A claimant who is regularly employed on a seasonal basis must be
available for other types of work in the off-season to be eligible for
benefits.
(5)(a) The claimant's unemployment is not due to the claimant voluntar-
ily leaving employment without good cause connected with the claimant's
employment or because of the claimant's discharge for workplace miscon-
duct in connection with the claimant's employment.
(b) The requirement that good cause for a voluntary leaving of employ-
ment be in connection with employment does not apply and good cause is
shown where a claimant demonstrates that:
(a)(i) The leaving was necessary to protect the claimant or any
minor child of the claimant from domestic violence or the leaving
was due to domestic violence that caused the claimant to rea-
sonably believe that the claimant's continued employment would
jeopardize the safety of the claimant or any minor child of the
claimant; and (ii) The the claimant made all reasonable efforts to
preserve the employment; or
(b) (ii) The claimant is a military spouse who voluntarily
left the claimant's most recent employment to relocate with the


claimant's spouse who, because of a permanent change of station
orders, was required to move to a location from which the commute
to the claimant's most recent employment was impractical, but
only if, before leaving, the claimant took reasonable actions to
maintain the employment relationship through accommodation dis-
cussions with the claimant's employer.; or
(iii) The claimant quit a temporary job for a permanent job or quit
part-time employment for employment with an increase in the number
of hours worked.
(c) The following definitions apply to this subsection:
(i) "Domestic violence" is as defined in section 39-6303, Idaho
Code, and also includes the crime of stalking in the second degree
pursuant to section 18-7906, Idaho Code;
(ii) "Military spouse" means the spouse of a member of the armed
forces of the United States or a reserve component of the armed
forces of the United States stationed in this state in accordance
with military orders or stationed in this state before a reassign-
ment to duties outside this state; and
(iii) "Permanent change of station orders" means the assignment,
reassignment, or transfer of a member of the armed forces of the
United States or a reserve component of the armed forces of the
United States from the member's present duty station or location
without return to the previous duty station or location.
(d) Good cause connected with employment exists when a claimant's rea-
sons for leaving the employment arise from the working conditions, job
tasks, or employment agreement. If the claimant's reasons for leaving
the employment arise from personal or other matters unrelated to em-
ployment, the reasons are not connected with the claimant's employment.
(i) The standard of what constitutes good cause is the standard
of reasonableness as applied to the average adult. Whether good
cause is present depends on whether a reasonable person would con-
sider the circumstances resulting in the claimant's unemployment
to be real, substantial, and compelling.
(ii) A claimant who leaves a job because of a reasonable and seri-
ous objection to the work requirements of the employer on moral or
ethical grounds and is otherwise eligible shall not be denied ben-
efits.
(iii) A claimant whose unemployment is due to his health or physi-
cal condition that makes it impossible for him to continue to per-
form the duties of the job shall be deemed to have quit work with
good cause connected with employment.
(iv) An individual who has continuing suitable work available and
who voluntarily elects to retire or to terminate employment during
a period of reorganization or downsizing shall be deemed to have
voluntarily quit the employment for personal reasons.
(v) The eligibility of a claimant discharged before a pending
resignation has occurred for reasons unrelated to the pending res-
ignation shall be determined on the basis of the discharge.
(vi) If a claimant had given notice of a pending resignation but
was discharged before the effective date of the resignation, both


separations shall be considered. The following three (3) elements
must be present for both actions to affect the claimant's eligi-
bility:
1. The employee gave notice to the employer of a specific
separation date;
2. The employer's decision to discharge the claimant before
the effective date of the resignation was a consequence of
the pending separation; and
3. The discharge occurred a short time prior to the effec-
tive date of the resignation.
(vii) Good cause for quitting employment may be established by
showing the claimant was subjected to harassment that is unlawful
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 59, title 67, Idaho Code.
(e) If a claimant has resigned after receiving a notice of discharge or
lay off due to a lack of work, but before the effective date of the dis-
charge, both separations shall be considered. The following three (3)
elements must be present for both actions to affect the claimant's eli-
gibility:
(i) The employee was given notice by the employer of a specific
separation date;
(ii) The employee's decision to quit before the effective date of
the termination was a consequence of the pending separation; and
(iii) The voluntary quit occurred a short time prior to the effec-
tive date of the termination.
(f) A claimant who has been suspended without pay for an indefinite pe-
riod of time and who has not been given a date to return to work shall be
considered discharged.
(6)(a) The claimant's unemployment is not due to his failure without
good cause to apply for available suitable work or to accept suitable
work within seven (7) days of when it is offered to him, unless a con-
dition specified in subsection (8) of this section applies or the job
offered does not constitute suitable employment pursuant to the pro-
visions of subsection (9) of this section. A claimant has the respon-
sibility to apply for and accept suitable work. The longer a claimant
has been unemployed, the more willing he must be to seek other types
of work and accept work at a lower rate of pay. Failure to appear for a
previously scheduled job interview without notifying the employer of
the need to cancel or reschedule shall constitute a failure to apply for
suitable work for that week.
(b) The department shall establish an email address and web portal that
allows employers to report suspected violations of this subsection. As
part of its regular communication with employers, the department shall
at least annually inform employers of the email address and web portal
described in this subsection and the mechanism to report suspected vio-
lations.
(c) For the purposes of paragraph (a) of this subsection, a good cause
reason for not applying for available and suitable work or responding to
an offer of suitable employment shall be found only if the claimant is
ill, injured, or delayed by reason of an accident or medical emergency
involving the claimant or a member of the claimant's immediate family.


(d) To have good cause to refuse to apply for or accept available suit-
able work because of personal circumstances, a claimant must show that
his circumstances were so compelling that a reasonably prudent individ-
ual would have acted in the same manner under the same circumstances.
For purposes of paragraph (a) of this subsection, good cause includes
but is not limited to circumstances where:
(i) The work would require the claimant to work on days contrary
to his religious convictions;
(ii) The claimant has reasonable, serious objections to the work
or the workplace on moral or ethical grounds;
(iii) The claimant has excellent prospects for more suitable work
with his former employer or in his regular occupation;
(iv) The claimant is unable to meet an employer's restrictions on
citizenship or residency;
(v) The travel distance to available work is excessive or unrea-
sonable. A claimant is ineligible if he fails to apply for and ac-
cept suitable work within a commuting area similar to other work-
ers in his area and occupation; and
(vi) The claimant cannot meet government requirements within a
reasonable period of time.
(e) A claimant shall be ineligible for benefits if:
(i) The claimant causes an employer to withdraw an offer of suit-
able work or terminate the offer after the claimant has accepted
it;
(ii) The claimant fails without good cause to comply with rea-
sonable, lawful requirements that are typical of certain occupa-
tions, such as a requirement that a worker be bonded;
(iii) The claimant, after being laid off, fails to return to work
on the date specified by the employer at the time of layoff or fails
to respond to a callback after a layoff; and
(iv) The claimant fails to report to the department when so di-
rected, fails to follow explicit instructions for applying for
available suitable work, or fails to report to work after accept-
ing employment, without good cause.
(f) A claimant must be available for and willing to accept suitable
part-time work in the absence of suitable full-time work.
(7) In determining whether or not work is suitable for an individual,
the degree of risk involved to his health, safety, morals, physical fitness,
experience, training, past earnings, length of unemployment and prospects
for obtaining local employment in his customary occupation, the distance of
the work from his residence, and other pertinent factors shall be consid-
ered. No employment shall be deemed suitable and benefits shall not be de-
nied to any otherwise eligible individual for refusing to accept new work or
to hold himself available for work under any of the following conditions:
(a) If the vacancy of the position offered is due directly to a strike,
lockout, or other labor dispute;
(b) If the wages, hours, or other conditions of the work offered are
below those prevailing for similar work in the locality of the work of-
fered;


(c) If, as a condition of being employed, the individual would be re-
quired to join a company union or to resign from or refrain from joining
any bona fide labor organization.
(8) No claimant who is otherwise eligible shall be denied benefits for
any week due to an inability to comply with the requirements contained in
subsections (4)(a)(i) and (6) of this section if:
(a) The claimant is a participant in a program sponsored by title I of
the workforce innovation and opportunity act (29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq., as
amended) and attends a job training course under that program; or
(b) The claimant attends a job training course authorized pursuant to
the provisions of section 236(a)(1) of the trade act of 1974 or the North
American free trade agreement implementation act.
(c) The claimant lacks skills to compete in the labor market and attends
a job training course with the approval of the director. The director
may approve job training courses that meet the following criteria:
(i) The purpose of the job training is to teach the claimant
skills that will enhance the claimant's opportunities for employ-
ment; and
(ii) The job training can be completed within two (2) years, ex-
cept that this requirement may be waived pursuant to rules that the
director may prescribe.
(9) No claimant who is otherwise eligible shall be denied benefits
under subsection (5) of this section for leaving employment to attend job
training pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, provided that the
claimant obtained the employment after enrollment in or during scheduled
breaks in the job training course or that the employment was not suitable.
For purposes of this subsection, the term "suitable employment" means work
of a substantially equal or higher skill level than the individual's past
employment and wages for such work are no less than eighty percent (80%) of
the average weekly wage in the individual's past employment.
(10)(a) A claimant shall not be eligible to receive benefits for any
week with respect to which it is found that his unemployment is due to a
labor dispute; provided, that this subsection shall not apply if it is
shown that:
(a) (i) The claimant is not participating, financing, aiding,
abetting, or directly interested in the labor dispute; and
(b) (ii) The claimant does not belong to a grade or class of work-
ers with members who are employed at the premises at which the la-
bor dispute occurs and who are participating in or directly inter-
ested in the dispute.
(b) For purposes of this section, "labor dispute" means a controversy
with respect to wages, hours, working conditions, or right of represen-
tation affecting the work or employment of a number of individuals em-
ployed for hire that results in a deadlock or impasse between the con-
tending parties.
(c) A claimant may not be denied benefits because of a labor dispute
if the dispute is not in any way directly connected with the factory,
establishment, or premises at which the individual is or was last em-
ployed.


(d) A claimant's unemployment shall be deemed to be due to lack of work
and not due to a labor dispute if it is shown that because of the labor
dispute the employer's business has fallen off to the extent that the
employer can no longer utilize the services of the claimant due to the
drop in business.
(e) A claimant laid off because of lack of work from an employer where a
labor dispute later occurred shall not be considered unemployed due to
the labor dispute.
(f) The period of ineligibility under this section applies for the
whole of any week in which any part of a claimant's unemployment is due
to a labor dispute.
(g) The act of picketing the work site of a labor dispute constitutes
participation in the labor dispute, whether or not payment is made for
such services.
(h) Voluntary refusal to cross a peaceable picket line to work consti-
tutes participation in a labor dispute.
(i) Subsequent employment does not make the claimant eligible for ben-
efits if his unemployment is still due to the labor dispute. As long as
the claimant intends to return to the employer where the labor dispute
exists, his unemployment shall be considered due to the labor dispute
regardless of any intervening employment.
(j) The period of ineligibility due to the labor dispute terminates at
the end of the calendar week in which the labor dispute no longer exists.
The termination of the dispute does not automatically make a claimant
eligible for benefits.
(k) The fact that an individual is a dues-paying union member alone does
not constitute financing a labor dispute, and the fact that he is not a
union member does not establish that he is not financing or participat-
ing in the dispute.
(11) A claimant shall not be entitled to benefits for any week with re-
spect to which or a part of which he has received or is seeking benefits un-
der an unemployment insurance law of another state or of the United States;
provided, that if the appropriate agency of such other state or of the United
States shall finally determine that he is not entitled to such unemployment
compensation or insurance benefits, he shall not by the provisions of this
subsection be denied benefits. For purposes of this section, a law of the
United States providing any payments of any type and in any amounts for pe-
riods of unemployment due to involuntary unemployment shall be considered an
unemployment insurance law of the United States.
(12) A claimant shall not be entitled to benefits for a period of
fifty-two (52) weeks if it is determined that he has willfully made a false
statement or willfully failed to report a material fact in order to obtain
benefits. The period of disqualification shall commence the week the deter-
mination is issued. The claimant shall also be ineligible for waiting week
credit and shall repay any sums received for any week for which the claimant
received waiting week credit or benefits as a result of having willfully
made a false statement or willfully failed to report a material fact. The
claimant shall also be ineligible for waiting week credit or benefits for any
week in which he owes the department an overpayment, civil penalty, or inter-


est resulting from a determination that he willfully made a false statement
or willfully failed to report a material fact.
(13) A claimant shall not be entitled to benefits if his principal oc-
cupation is self-employment. A claimant who performs incidental work in
self-employment shall show that self-employment does not interfere with his
availability for suitable work and that he continues to seek suitable work.
(14) A claimant who has been found ineligible for benefits under the
provisions of subsection (5), (6), (7) or (9) of this section shall reestab-
lish his eligibility by having obtained bona fide work and received wages
therefor in an amount of at least fourteen (14) times his weekly benefit
amount.
(15) Benefits based on service in employment defined in sections
72-1349A and 72-1352(3), Idaho Code, shall be payable in the same amount, on
the same terms and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the
basis of other service subject to this act.
(a) If the services performed during one-half (1/2) or more of any con-
tract period by an individual for an educational institution as defined
in section 72-1322B, Idaho Code, are in an instructional, research, or
principal administrative capacity, all the services shall be deemed to
be in such capacity.
(b) If the services performed during less than one-half (1/2) of any
contract period by an individual for an educational institution are in
an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity, none
of the services shall be deemed to be in such capacity.
(c) As used in this section, "contract period" means the entire period
for which the individual contracts to perform services, pursuant to the
terms of the contract.
(16) No claimant is eligible to receive benefits in two (2) successive
benefit years unless, after the beginning of the first benefit year during
which he received benefits, he performed service and earned an amount equal
to no less than six (6) times the weekly benefit amount established during
the first benefit year.
(17)(a) Benefits based on wages earned for services performed in an
instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity for an
educational institution shall not be paid for any week of unemployment
commencing during the period between two (2) successive academic years,
or during a similar period between two (2) terms whether or not succes-
sive, or during a period of paid sabbatical leave provided for in the
individual's contract, to any individual who performs such services in
the first academic year (or term) and has a contract to perform services
in any such capacity for any educational institution in the second aca-
demic year or term or has been given reasonable assurance that such a
contract will be offered.
(b) Benefits based on wages earned for services performed in any other
capacity for an educational institution shall not be paid to any indi-
vidual for any week that commences during a period between two (2) suc-
cessive school years or terms if the individual performs such services
in the first school year or term and there is a contract or reasonable
assurance that the individual will perform such services in the second
school year or term. If benefits are denied to any individual under this


paragraph and the individual was not offered an opportunity to perform
such services for the educational institution for the second academic
year or term, the individual shall be entitled to a retroactive payment
of benefits for each week for which the individual filed a timely claim
for benefits and for which benefits were denied solely by reason of this
paragraph.
(c) With respect to any services described in paragraphs (a) and (b)
of this subsection, benefits shall not be paid nor waiting week credit
given to an individual for wages earned for services for any week that
commences during an established and customary vacation period or holi-
day recess if the individual performed the services in the period imme-
diately before the vacation period or holiday recess and there is a rea-
sonable assurance the individual will perform such services in the pe-
riod immediately following such vacation period or holiday recess.
(d) With respect to any services described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of
this subsection, benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services
in any capacities specified in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this sub-
section to any individual who performed such services in an educational
institution while in the employ of an educational service agency. For
purposes of this paragraph, the term "educational service agency" means
a governmental entity that is established and operated exclusively for
the purpose of providing such services to one (1) or more educational
institutions.
(e) "Reasonable assurance" of continuing employment exists when an ed-
ucational institution or service agency provides a written statement to
the department confirming that the claimant has been given a bona fide
offer of a specific job in the second academic period and explaining the
circumstances of the offer. In addition, for such reasonable assurance
to exist, the terms and conditions of the job offered in the second pe-
riod must not be substantially less favorable than the terms and condi-
tions of the job performed in the first period.
(f) A claimant who initially was determined not to have a reasonable
assurance of continuing employment shall subsequently become disquali-
fied for benefits under this section when an educational institution or
service agency gives the claimant such reasonable assurance.
(g) A claimant seeking retroactive payments pursuant to paragraph (b)
of this subsection must make a request for the retroactive payment with
the department no later than thirty (30) days after the beginning of the
second school year or term or retroactive payment will not be made.
(h) Employees of educational institutions hired under contract for the
school term are considered unemployed between school terms even though
they may receive their salary in twelve (12) monthly payments.
(18)(a) Benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services that
substantially consist of participating in sports or athletic events or
training or preparing to participate for any week that commences during
the period between two (2) successive sport seasons (or similar peri-
ods) if the individual performed services in the first season (or simi-
lar period) and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will
perform such services in the later of such seasons (or similar period).


(b) No base period wages shall be used to establish a claim when sub-
stantially all services performed during the base period consist of
participation in sports, athletic events, training, or preparing to so
participate, for any week that commences during the period between two
(2) successive sport seasons or similar periods if the individual per-
formed such services in the first season or similar period and there is a
reasonable assurance that the individual will perform such services in
the later of such seasons or similar periods.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, "reasonable assurance" does not
exist unless:
(i) The claimant has a contract, either written or oral;
(ii) The claimant offered to work and the employer expressed an
interest in hiring the player for the next season or similar pe-
riod; or
(iii) The claimant expresses a readiness and willingness or in-
tent to participate in the sport the following season or similar
period.
(d) Reasonable assurance exists if the claimant intends to pursue em-
ployment as a professional athlete the next season despite not having a
specific employer to return to or a formal offer of employment.
(e) An individual is deemed to have performed "substantially all ser-
vices" in sports, athletic events, training, or preparing to so partic-
ipate if ninety percent (90%) or more of the base period wages were based
on such services.
(19)(a) Benefits shall not be payable on the basis of services performed
by an alien unless the alien was lawfully admitted for permanent resi-
dence at the time such services were performed, was lawfully present for
purposes of performing such services, or was permanently residing in
the United States under color of law at the time the services were per-
formed (including an alien who was lawfully present in the United States
as a result of the application of the provisions of sections 207 and 208
or section 212(d)(5) of the immigration and nationality act).
(b) Any data or information required of individuals applying for bene-
fits to determine eligibility under this subsection shall be uniformly
required from all applicants for benefits.
(c) A decision to deny benefits under this subsection must be based on a
preponderance of the evidence.
(20) An individual who has been determined to be likely to exhaust regu-
lar benefits and to need reemployment services pursuant to a profiling sys-
tem established by the director must participate in those reemployment ser-
vices, unless:
(a) The individual has completed such services; or
(b) There is justifiable cause, as determined by the director, for the
claimant's failure to participate in such services.
(21)(a) A claimant:
(i) Who has been assigned to work for one (1) or more customers of
a staffing service; and
(ii) Who, at the time of hire by the staffing service, signed a
written notice informing him that completion or termination of an


assignment for a customer would not, of itself, terminate the em-
ployment relationship with the staffing service;
will not be considered unemployed upon completion or termination of an
assignment until such time as he contacts the staffing service to deter-
mine if further suitable work is available. If the claimant:
1. Contacts the staffing service and refuses a suitable work
assignment that is offered to him at that time, he will be
considered to have voluntarily quit that employment; or
2. Contacts the staffing service and the service does not
have a suitable work assignment for him, he will be consid-
ered unemployed due to a lack of work; or
3. Accepts new employment without first contacting the
staffing service for additional work, he will be considered
to have voluntarily quit employment with the staffing ser-
vice.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "staffing service"
means any person who assigns individuals to work for its customers and
includes but is not limited to professional employers as defined in
chapter 24, title 44, Idaho Code, and the employers of temporary employ-
ees as defined in section 44-2403(7), Idaho Code.
(22)(a) A claimant who is otherwise eligible for regular benefits as
defined in section 72-1367A(1)(e), Idaho Code, shall be eligible for
training extension benefits if the department determines that all of
the following criteria are met:
(i) The claimant is unemployed;
(ii) The claimant has exhausted all rights to regular unem-
ployment benefits as defined in section 72-1367A(1)(e), Idaho
Code, and all rights to extended benefits as defined in section
72-1367A(1)(f), Idaho Code, and all rights to benefits under sec-
tion 2002 (increase in unemployment compensation benefits) of
division B, title II, the assistance for unemployed workers and
struggling families act, of the American recovery and reinvest-
ment act of 2009, P.L. 111-5, as enacted on February 17, 2009;
(iii) The claimant is enrolled in a training program approved by
the department or in a job training program authorized under the
workforce innovation and opportunity act; except that the train-
ing program must prepare the claimant for entry into a high-demand
occupation if the department determines that the claimant sepa-
rated from a declining occupation or has been involuntarily and
indefinitely separated from employment as a result of a permanent
reduction of operations at the claimant's place of employment.
For the purposes of this subsection, a "declining occupation"
is one where there is a lack of sufficient current demand in the
claimant's labor market area for the occupational skills for which
the claimant is qualified by training and experience or current
physical or mental capacity and the lack of employment opportuni-
ties is expected to continue for an extended period of time, or the
claimant's occupation is one for which there is a seasonal vari-
ation in demand in the labor market and the claimant has no other
skills for which there is current demand. For the purposes of this


subsection, a "high-demand occupation" is an occupation in a labor
market area where work opportunities are available and qualified
applicants are lacking as determined by the use of available labor
market information;
(iv) The claimant is making satisfactory progress to complete the
training as determined by the department; and
(v) The claimant is not receiving similar stipends or other train-
ing allowances for nontraining costs. For the purposes of this
subsection, "similar stipend" means an amount provided under a
program with similar aims, such as providing training to increase
employability, and in approximately the same amounts.
(b) The weekly training extension benefit amount shall equal the
claimant's weekly benefit amount for the most recent benefit year less
any deductible income as determined by the provisions of this chapter.
The total amount of training extension benefits payable to a claimant
shall be equal to twenty-six (26) times the claimant's average weekly
benefit amount for the most recent benefit year. A claimant who is
receiving training extension benefits shall not be denied training ex-
tension benefits due to the application of subsections (4)(a)(i) and
(6) of this section, and an employer's account shall not be charged for
training extension benefits paid to the claimant.
SECTION 29. That Section 72-1367, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1367. BENEFIT FORMULA. (1) To be eligible an individual shall have
the minimum qualifying amount of wages in covered employment in at least one
(1) calendar quarter of his base period, and shall have total base period
wages of at least one and one-quarter (1 1/4) times his high quarter wages.
The minimum qualifying amount of wages shall be determined each January 1 and
shall equal fifty percent (50%) of the product of the state minimum wage, as
defined by section 44-1502, Idaho Code, multiplied by five hundred twenty
(520) hours, rounded to the lowest multiple of twenty-six (26).
(2) The weekly benefit amount shall be one twenty-sixth (1/26) of high-
est quarter wages except that it shall not exceed the applicable maximum
weekly benefit amount. The maximum weekly benefit amount shall be estab-
lished by the director, who shall determine the state average weekly wage
paid by covered employers for the preceding calendar year and the maximum
weekly benefit amount to be effective for new claims filed in the first full
week of the following January and filed thereafter until a new maximum weekly
benefit amount becomes effective under this subsection. The average weekly
wage shall be computed by dividing the total wages paid in covered employ-
ment, including state government and cost reimbursement employers, for the
preceding calendar year, as computed from data reported to the department
by covered employers, by the monthly average number of workers in covered
employment for the preceding calendar year and then dividing the result-
ing figure by fifty-two (52). The maximum weekly benefit amount shall be
fifty-five percent (55%) of the state average weekly wage paid by covered
employers for the preceding calendar year.
(3) Any eligible individual shall be entitled during any benefit year
to a total amount of benefits equal to his weekly benefit amount times the


number of full weeks of benefit entitlement appearing in the following table
based on his ratio of total base period earnings to highest quarter base pe-
riod earnings. The maximum weeks of entitlement are based on a sliding scale
of the official forecasted, seasonally adjusted unemployment rate for the
state for a minimum of ten (10) weeks to a maximum of twenty-six (26) weeks
depending on the unemployment rate in effect for the months of February, May,
August and November as follows:
(a) For any benefit week commencing in January through March of a calen-
dar year, the maximum allowed number of benefit weeks shall be based on
the unemployment rate for the preceding month of November;
(b) For any benefit week commencing in April through June of a calendar
year, the maximum allowed number of benefit weeks shall be based on the
unemployment rate for the preceding month of February;
(c) For any benefit week commencing in July through September of a cal-
endar year, the maximum allowed number of benefit weeks shall be based
on the unemployment rate for the preceding month of May; and
(d) For any benefit week commencing in October through December of a
calendar year, the maximum allowed number of benefit weeks shall be
based on the unemployment rate for the preceding month of August.


Ratio of Total Base Full Weeks of Benefit Entitlement Adjusted By the
Period Unemployment Rate
Earnings to Highest
Quarter
Earnings
At Least Up To 8% or 7% to 6% to 5% to 4% to 3% to 2.9% or
Higher 7.9% 6.9% 5.9% 4.9% 3.9% Lower
1.25 1.60 10 10 10 10 10 10 10
1.6001 1.80 11 10 10 10 10 10 10
1.8001 1.92 12 11 10 10 10 10 10
1.9201 2.01 13 12 11 10 10 10 10
2.0101 2.08 14 13 12 11 10 10 10
2.0801 2.14 15 14 13 12 11 10 10
2.1401 2.21 16 15 14 13 12 11 10
2.2101 2.29 17 16 15 14 13 12 11
2.2901 2.38 18 17 16 15 14 13 12
2.3801 2.49 19 18 17 16 15 14 13
2.4901 2.61 20 19 18 17 16 15 14
2.6101 2.75 21 20 19 18 17 16 15
2.7501 2.91 22 21 20 19 18 17 16
2.9101 3.10 23 22 21 20 19 18 17
3.1001 3.32 24 23 22 21 20 19 18
3.3201 3.56 25 24 23 22 21 20 19
3.5601 4.00 26 25 24 23 22 21 20


(4) If the total wages payable to an individual for less than full-time
work performed in a week claimed exceed one-half (1/2) of his weekly benefit
amount, the amount of wages that exceed one-half (1/2) of the weekly benefit
amount shall be deducted from the benefits payable to the claimant. For pur-
poses of this subsection, severance pay shall be deemed wages, even if the
claimant was required to sign a release of claims as a condition of receiving
the pay from the employer. "Severance pay" means a payment or payments made
to a claimant by an employer as a result of the severance of the employment
relationship.
(5) Benefits payable to an individual shall be rounded to the next lower
full dollar amount.
SECTION 30. That Section 72-1367A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
72-1367A. EXTENDED BENEFITS. The extended benefits program shall be
administered pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(1) Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise:
(a) "Extended benefit period" means a period which:
(i) Begins with the third week after a week for which there is a
state "on" indicator; and
(ii) Ends with either of the following weeks, whichever occurs
later:
1. The third week after the first week for which there is a
state "off" indicator; or
2. The thirteenth consecutive week of such period;
provided, that no extended benefit period may begin by reason of a state
"on" indicator before the fourteenth week following the end of a prior
extended benefit period which was in effect with respect to this state.
(b)(i) There is a state "on" indicator for any week if the direc-
tor determines, in accordance with the regulations of the United
States secretary of labor, that for the period consisting of such
week and the immediately preceding twelve (12) weeks, the rate of
insured unemployment (not seasonally adjusted):
1. Equaled or exceeded one hundred twenty percent (120%)
of the average of such rates for the corresponding thirteen
(13) week period ending in each of the preceding two (2) cal-
endar years and equaled or exceeded five percent (5%); or
2. Equaled or exceeded six percent (6%).
(ii) With respect to weeks of unemployment beginning on or after
February 1, 2009, and ending four (4) weeks prior to the last week
for which federal sharing is authorized by section 2005(a) ("full
federal funding of extended unemployment compensation for a lim-
ited period") of division B, title II, the assistance for unem-
ployed workers and struggling families act, of the American recov-
ery and reinvestment act of 2009, P.L. 111-5, as amended, there is
a state "on" indicator for any week if the director determines, in
accordance with the regulations of the United States secretary of
labor that:


1. The average rate of seasonally adjusted total unemploy-
ment, as determined by the United States secretary of labor,
for the period consisting of the most recent three (3) months
for which data for all states are published before the close
of such week equals or exceeds six and five-tenths percent
(6.5%); and
2. The average rate of seasonally adjusted total unemploy-
ment in the state, as determined by the United States secre-
tary of labor, for the three (3) month period referred to in
subsection (1)(b)(ii)1. equals or exceeds one hundred ten
percent (110%) of such average for either or both of the cor-
responding three (3) month periods ending in the two (2) pre-
ceding calendar years.
3. With respect to weeks of unemployment beginning on or
after January 1, 2011, and ending on December 31, 2011, or
the expiration date in section 502 of the tax relief, un-
employment insurance reauthorization and job creation act
of 2010, P.L. 111-312, as amended, whichever is later, the
average rate of seasonally adjusted total unemployment in
the state, as determined by the United States secretary of
labor, for the three (3) month period referred to in subsec-
tion (1)(b)(ii)1. equals or exceeds one hundred ten percent
(110%) of such average for any and all of the corresponding
three (3) month periods ending in the three (3) preceding
calendar years.
(c) There is a state "off" indicator for any week if the director deter-
mines, in accordance with the regulations of the United States secre-
tary of labor, that for the period consisting of such week and the imme-
diately preceding twelve (12) weeks:
(i) The rate of insured unemployment (not seasonally adjusted)
was less than six percent (6%) and was less than one hundred twenty
percent (120%) of the average of such rates for the corresponding
thirteen (13) week period ending in each of the preceding two (2)
calendar years; or
(ii) The rate of insured unemployment (not seasonally adjusted)
was less than five percent (5%); or
(iii) The option specified in subsection (1)(b)(ii) does not re-
sult in an "on" indicator.
(d) "Rate of insured unemployment," for purposes of paragraphs (b) and
(c) of this subsection, means the percentage derived by dividing:
(i) The average weekly number of individuals filing claims for
regular compensation in this state for weeks of unemployment for
the most recent thirteen (13) consecutive week period, as deter-
mined by the director on the basis of his reports to the United
States secretary of labor; by
(ii) The average monthly employment covered under this chapter
for the first four (4) of the most recent six (6) completed calen-
dar quarters ending before the end of such thirteen (13) week pe-
riod.


(e) "Regular benefits" means benefits payable to an individual under
this chapter or under any other state law (including benefits payable
to federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen pursuant to 5 U.S.C.
chapter 85) other than extended benefits.
(f) "Extended benefits" means benefits (including benefits payable to
federal civilian employees and to ex-servicemen pursuant to 5 U.S.C.
chapter 85) payable to an individual under the provisions of this sec-
tion for weeks of unemployment in his eligibility period.
(g) "Eligibility period" of an individual means the period consisting
of the weeks in his benefit year which begin in an extended benefit pe-
riod and, if his benefit year ends within such extended benefit period,
any weeks thereafter which begin in such period. Eligibility period
of an individual also means the period consisting of weeks which begin
in his extended benefit period, without regard to his benefit year end
date, if the individual qualifies for one hundred percent (100%) fed-
erally financed federal-state extended benefits and the one hundred
percent (100%) federally financed federal-state extended benefit pay-
ment period began on or before the individual exhausted his rights to
benefits under the federal emergency unemployment compensation program
of 2008.
(h) "Exhaustee" means an individual who, with respect to any week of un-
employment in his eligibility period:
(i) Has received, prior to such week, all of the regular ben-
efits that were available to him under this chapter or any reg-
ular or extended benefits available to him under any other state
law (including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and
ex-servicemen under 5 U.S.C. chapter 85) in his current benefit
year that includes such week; provided that for the purposes of
this subparagraph, an individual shall be deemed to have received
all of the regular benefits that were available to him although as
a result of a pending appeal with respect to wages that were not
considered in the original monetary determination in his benefit
year, he may subsequently be determined to be entitled to added
regular benefits; or
(ii) His benefit year having expired prior to such week, has no or
insufficient wages on the basis of which he could establish a new
benefit year that would include such week; and
(iii) Has no right to unemployment benefits or allowances under
the railroad unemployment insurance act and such other federal
laws as are specified in regulations issued by the United States
secretary of labor; and has not received and is not seeking unem-
ployment benefits under the unemployment insurance law of Canada;
but if he is seeking such benefits and the appropriate agency de-
termines that he is not entitled to benefits under such law he is
considered an exhaustee.
(i) "State law" means the unemployment insurance law of any state ap-
proved by the United States secretary of labor under section 3304 of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1954.
(j) For purposes of this section only, the term "suitable work" means,
with respect to any individual, any work which is within such individ-


ual's capabilities; except that, if the individual furnishes evidence
satisfactory to the department that such individual's prospects for ob-
taining work in his customary occupation within a reasonably short pe-
riod are good, the determination of whether any work is suitable work
with respect to such individual shall be made in accordance with appli-
cable state law. Satisfactory evidence includes but is not limited to:
(i) A letter signed by a prospective employer giving assurances
of work within the next four (4) weeks; or
(ii) A verifiable, written statement by the claimant that he will
have work within the next four (4) weeks.
(2) Effect of state law provisions relating to regular benefits on
claims for, and the payment of, extended benefits. Except when the result
would be inconsistent with the other provisions of this section, the provi-
sions of this chapter which apply to claims for, or the payment of, regular
benefits shall apply to claims for, and the payment of, extended benefits.
(3) Eligibility requirements for extended benefits. An individual
shall be eligible to receive extended benefits with respect to any week of
unemployment in his eligibility period only if the director finds that with
respect to such week:
(a) The claimant is an "exhaustee" as defined in subsection (1)(h) of
this section;
(b) The claimant has satisfied the requirements of this chapter for the
receipt of regular benefits that are applicable to individuals claim-
ing extended benefits, including not being subject to a disqualifica-
tion for the receipt of benefits;
(c) The claimant has had twenty (20) weeks of full-time employment for
covered employers during his base period, or earned wages for services
performed for covered employers during his base period equal to at least
one and one-half (1 1/2) times his high quarter wages, or has earned
wages for services performed for covered employers during his base pe-
riod equal to at least forty (40) times his most recent weekly benefit
amount.
(d)(i) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, payment of
extended benefits under this chapter shall not be made to any indi-
vidual for any week of unemployment in his eligibility period:
1. During which he fails to accept any offer of suitable
work, as defined in subsection (1)(j) of this section, or
fails to apply for any suitable work to which he was re-
ferred; or
2. During which he fails to actively engage in seeking work.
(ii) If any individual is ineligible for extended benefits for any
week by reason of a failure described in subsection (3)(d)(i)1. or
(3)(d)(i)2. of this section, the individual shall be ineligible
to receive extended benefits for any week which begins during a pe-
riod which:
1. Begins with the week following the week in which such
failure occurs; and
2. Does not end until such individual has been employed dur-
ing at least four (4) weeks which begin after such failure
and the total of the remuneration earned by the individual


for being so employed is not less than the product of four
(4) multiplied by the individual's average weekly benefit
amount. Remuneration earned must be in employment where an
employee-employer relationship exists to satisfy requali-
fication requirements for extended benefits.
(iii) Extended benefits shall not be denied under subsection
(3)(d)(i)1. of this section to any individual for any week by rea-
son of a failure to accept an offer of, or apply for, suitable work:
1. If the gross average weekly remuneration payable to such
individual for the position does not exceed the sum of:
(A) The individual's average weekly benefit amount,
as determined for purposes of subsection (b)(1)(C) of
section 202 of the federal-state extended unemployment
compensation act of 1970, for his benefit year; plus
(B) The amount, if any, of supplemental unemploy-
ment compensation benefits, as defined in section
501(c)(17)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954,
payable to such individual for such week.
2. If the position was not offered to such individual in
writing or was not listed with the department;
3. If such failure would not result in a denial of benefits
under the provisions of this chapter to the extent that such
provisions are not inconsistent with the provisions of sub-
sections (1)(j) and (3)(d)(iv) of this section; or
4. If the position pays wages less than the higher of:
(A) The minimum wage provided by section 6(a)(1) of the
fair labor standards act of 1938, without regard to any
exemption; or
(B) Any applicable state or local minimum wage.
(iv) For purposes of this paragraph, an individual shall be
treated as actively engaged in seeking work during any week if:
1. The individual has engaged in a systematic and sustained
effort to obtain work during such week; and
2. The individual provides tangible evidence to the depart-
ment that he has engaged in such an effort during such week.
(v) For purposes of this section only, the department shall re-
fer applicants for extended benefits to any suitable work to which
paragraphs 1., 2., 3. and 4. of subsection (3)(d)(iii) of this
section would not apply.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, payment
of extended benefits shall not be made to any individual for any week if:
(i) Extended benefits would, but for this subsection have been
payable for such week pursuant to an interstate claim filed in any
state under the interstate benefit payment plan; and
(ii) An extended benefit period is not in effect for such week in
such state.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply with respect to the
first two (2) weeks for which extended benefits are payable, determined
without regard to this subsection, pursuant to an interstate claim


filed under the interstate benefit payment plan to the individual from
the extended benefits account established for the benefit year.
(c) Section 3304 (a)(9)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 shall
not apply to any denial of benefits required under this subsection.
(5) Weekly extended benefit amount. The weekly extended benefit amount
payable to an individual for a week of total unemployment in his eligibility
period shall be an amount equal to the weekly benefit amount payable to him
during his applicable benefit year.
(6)(a) Total extended benefit amount. The total extended benefit
amount payable to an eligible individual with respect to his applicable
benefit year shall be the least of the following amounts:
(i) Fifty percent (50%) of the total amount of regular benefits
which were payable to him under this chapter in his applicable ben-
efit year;
(ii) Thirteen (13) times his weekly benefit amount which was
payable to him under this chapter for a week of total unemployment
in the applicable benefit year;
(iii) Provided that the amount so determined shall be reduced by
the total amount of extended benefits paid, or being paid, to the
individual for weeks of extended unemployment in the individual's
benefit year which began prior to the effective date of the fed-
eral-state extended benefit period which is current in the week
for which the individual first claims such benefits.
(iv) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, if the
benefit year of any individual ends within an extended benefit pe-
riod, the remaining balance of extended benefits that such indi-
vidual would, but for the provisions of this section, be entitled
to receive in that extended benefit period, with respect to weeks
of unemployment beginning after the end of the benefit year, shall
be reduced, but not below zero (0), by the product of the number of
weeks for which the individual received any amounts as trade read-
justment allowances within that benefit year, multiplied by the
individual's weekly benefit amount for extended benefits.
(b)(i) Effective with respect to weeks beginning in a high unem-
ployment period, subsection (6)(a) of this section shall be ap-
plied by substituting:
1. "Eighty percent (80%)" for "fifty percent (50%)" in sub-
section (6)(a)(i) of this section; and
2. "Twenty (20)" for "thirteen (13)" in subsection
(6)(a)(ii) of this section.
(ii) For purposes of subsection (6)(b)(i) of this section, the
term "high unemployment period" means any period during which
an extended benefit period would be in effect if subsection
(1)(b)(ii) were applied by substituting "eight percent (8%)"
in subsection (1)(b)(ii)1. for "six and five-tenths percent
(6.5%)."
(7)(a) Beginning and termination of extended benefit period. Whenever
an extended benefit period is to become effective in this state as a re-
sult of a state "on" indicator, or an extended benefit period is to be


terminated in this state as a result of a state "off" indicator, the di-
rector shall make a public announcement.
(b) Computations required by the provisions of subsection (1)(d) of
this section shall be made by the director, in accordance with regula-
tions prescribed by the United States secretary of labor.
(8) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, none of the
benefits paid pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be charged to
an employer's account for purposes of experience rating.
(9) Whenever a program of unemployment benefits becomes available that
is financed entirely by the federal government, and such program will not
allow payments to individuals who are entitled to extended benefits pur-
suant to this section, the governor may, by executive order, trigger off an
extended benefit period as defined in subsection (1)(a) of this section in
order to provide payment of such federal benefits to individuals who have
exhausted their right to regular benefits. When the federal benefits are
exhausted, or if the director determines that payment of extended benefits
would be more economically advantageous to the state of Idaho, the governor
shall, by executive order, trigger extended benefits on if the criteria of
subsection (1)(b) of this section are otherwise met.
(10) Until conformity with the federal-state extended unemployment
compensation act of 1970 requires otherwise, the eligibility requirements
in subsections (1)(j) and (3)(d) of this section are suspended. Except
where inconsistent with the provisions of this section, the eligibility re-
quirements of section 72-1366, Idaho Code, applicable to claims for regular
benefits shall apply in lieu of the suspended provisions.
SECTION 31. That Section 72-1368, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1368. CLAIMS FOR BENEFITS -- APPELLATE PROCEDURE -- LIMITATION OF
ACTIONS. (1) Claims for benefits shall be made in accordance with this chap-
ter and such rules as the director may prescribe.
(2) Each employer shall post and maintain in places readily accessi-
ble to individuals performing services for him printed statements concern-
ing benefit rights under this chapter which shall be provided by the depart-
ment without cost to the employer.
(3)(a) Following the filing of a claim pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section the department shall:
(i) Verify the claimant's monetary eligibility pursuant to the
requirements of section 72-1367, Idaho Code, and issue a determi-
nation. If monetarily eligible, the department shall establish
the date the claimant's benefit year begins, the weekly benefit
amount, the total benefit amount, the base period wages, and the
base period covered employers.
(ii) If a claimant is monetarily eligible, the department shall
verify, based on information provided by the claimant, whether the
week claimed is a compensable week as defined in section 72-1312,
Idaho Code. To receive benefits, a claimant must certify that each
week claimed is a compensable week. In the event the week claimed
is not a compensable week, the department shall issue a determina-


tion denying benefits and shall include the reasons for the ineli-
gibility.
(b) If the department has reason to believe at any time within five
(5) years from the week ending date for any week in which benefits were
paid that a claimant was not eligible for benefits, the department may
investigate the claim and on the basis of facts found issue a determina-
tion denying or allowing benefits for the week(s) in question. If the
department determines a claimant was not entitled to benefits received,
the department shall issue a determination requiring repayment of the
overpaid benefits, and assess any applicable penalties and interest.
The determination shall contain provisions advising of the right to
appeal the decision to the department within fourteen (14) days of the
date of service.
(c) Before a determination provided for in subsection (3) of this sec-
tion becomes final or an appeal is filed, the department, on its own
motion, may issue a revised determination. The determination or re-
vised determination shall become final unless, within fourteen (14)
days after notice, as provided in subsection (5) of this section, an
appeal is filed by an interested party with the department. The appeal
notice must be in writing, signed by an interested party, the appellant
or representative, and contain words that, by fair interpretation, re-
quest the appeal process for a specific determination or other decision
of the department. If an appeal is delivered personally, the personal
delivery date will be noted on the appeal and deemed the date of filing.
A faxed or electronically transmitted appeal shall be deemed filed on
the date received by the department, mountain time, or, if received on a
weekend or holiday, the next business day. If mailed, the appeal shall
be deemed filed on the date of mailing as determined by the postmark on
the envelope containing the appeal. Where it appears any appeal to the
appeals examiner, claim, or any other request or application was not
filed within the time period prescribed for filing, it shall be dis-
missed on such grounds.
(d) If a party establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that, be-
cause of delay or error by the United States postal service or because
of error on the part of the department, a determination was not deliv-
ered to the party's last known address, or transmitted electronically
in a manner approved by the department, within fourteen (14) days of the
date of mailing or service indicated on the determination, the period
for filing a timely appeal extends to fourteen (14) days from the date of
actual notice.
(4)(a) Upon appeal of a determination or revised determination, the di-
rector shall transfer the appeal directly to an appeals examiner pur-
suant to subsection (6) of this section, unless the director finds, in
his sole discretion, that a redetermination should be issued affirming,
reversing or modifying the determination or revised determination. The
redetermination shall become final unless, within fourteen (14) days
after notice as provided in subsection (5) of this section, an appeal is
filed by an interested party with the department in accordance with the
department's rules.


(b) The director may, in his sole discretion, make a special redeter-
mination whenever he finds that a departmental error has occurred in
connection with a determination, revised determination or redetermi-
nation that has become final, or that additional wages of the claimant
or other facts pertinent to such final determination, revised deter-
mination or redetermination have become available or have been newly
discovered, or that benefits have been allowed or denied or the amount
of benefits fixed on the basis of nondisclosure or misrepresentation of
fact. The special redetermination must be made within one (1) year from
the date the determination, revised determination or redetermination
became final, except that a special redetermination involving a find-
ing that benefits have been allowed or denied or the amount of benefits
fixed on the basis of nondisclosures or misrepresentations of fact may
be made within two (2) years from the date the determination, revised
determination or redetermination became final.
(5) All interested parties shall be entitled to prompt service of no-
tice of written or digital communications from the department providing
notice of an administrative or other deadline including, but not limited
to, determinations, revised determinations, redeterminations, special
redeterminations, decisions and letters from the department requiring a
response within a specified time. Notice shall be deemed served if deliv-
ered to the person being served, if mailed to his last known address or if
electronically transmitted to him at his request and with the department's
approval. Service by mail shall be deemed complete on the date of mailing.
Service by electronic transmission shall be deemed complete on the date no-
tice is electronically transmitted.
(6) To hear and decide appeals from determinations, revised determina-
tions, redeterminations, and special redeterminations, the director shall
appoint appeals examiners. Unless the appeal is withdrawn, the appeals ex-
aminer shall affirm, modify, set aside or reverse the determination, revised
determination, redetermination, or special redetermination involved, after
affording the interested parties reasonable opportunity for a fair hearing,
or may refer a matter back to the department for further action. The appeals
examiner shall notify the interested parties of his decision by serving no-
tice in the same manner as provided in subsection (5) of this section. The
decision shall set forth findings of fact and conclusions of law and contain
provisions advising of the right to appeal the decision within fourteen (14)
days of the date of service. The appeals examiner may, either upon applica-
tion for rehearing by an interested party or on his own motion, rehear, af-
firm, modify, set aside or reverse any prior decision on the basis of the evi-
dence previously submitted or on the basis of additional evidence; provided,
that such application or motion be made within ten (10) days after the date of
service of the decision. A complete record shall be kept of all proceedings
in connection with an appealed claim. All testimony at any hearing shall be
recorded. If a claim for review of the appeals examiner's decision is filed
with the commission, the testimony shall be transcribed if ordered by the
commission. Witnesses subpoenaed by the appeals examiner shall be allowed
fees at a rate prescribed by the director. If any interested party to a hear-
ing formally requests the appeals examiner to issue a subpoena for a witness
whose evidence is deemed necessary, the appeals examiner shall promptly is-


sue the subpoena, unless such request is determined to be unreasonable. Un-
less an interested party shall within fourteen (14) days after service of the
decision of the appeals examiner file with the commission a claim for review
or unless an application or motion is made for a rehearing of such decision,
the decision of the appeals examiner shall become final.
(7) The commission shall decide all claims for review filed by any in-
terested party in accordance with its own rules of procedure not in conflict
herewith. The record before the commission shall consist of the record of
proceedings before the appeals examiner, unless it appears to the commission
that the interests of justice require that the interested parties be permit-
ted to present additional evidence. In that event, the commission may, in
its sole discretion, conduct a hearing or may remand the matter back to the
appeals examiner for an additional hearing and decision. On the basis of the
record of proceedings before the appeals examiner as well as additional ev-
idence, if allowed, the commission shall affirm, reverse, modify, set aside
or revise the decision of the appeals examiner or may refer the matter back to
the appeals examiner for further proceedings. The commission shall file its
decision and shall promptly serve notice of its decision to all interested
parties. A decision of the commission shall be final and conclusive as to all
matters adjudicated by the commission upon filing the decision in the office
of the commission; provided, within twenty (20) days from the date of filing
the decision, any party may move for reconsideration of the decision or the
commission may rehear or reconsider its decision on its own initiative. The
decision shall be final upon denial of a motion for rehearing or reconsidera-
tion or the filing of the decision on reconsideration.
(8) No person acting on behalf of the director or any member of the com-
mission shall participate in any case in which he has a direct or indirect
personal interest.
(9) An appeal may be made to the Supreme Court from decisions and orders
of the commission within the times and in the manner prescribed by rule of the
Supreme Court.
(10)(a) Benefits shall be paid promptly in accordance with any decision
allowing benefits, regardless of:
(i) The pendency of a time period for filing an appeal or peti-
tioning for commission review; or
(ii) The pendency of an appeal or petition for review.
(b) Such payments shall not be withheld until a subsequent appeals ex-
aminer decision or commission decision modifies or reverses the previ-
ous decision, in which event benefits shall be paid or denied in accor-
dance with such decision.
(11)(a) Any right, fact, or matter in issue, directly based upon or nec-
essarily involved in a determination, redetermination, decision of the
appeals examiner or decision of the commission which has become final,
shall be conclusive for all the purposes of this chapter as between the
interested parties who had notice of such determination, redetermina-
tion or decision. Subject to appeal proceedings and judicial review by
the Supreme Court as set forth in this section, any determination, rede-
termination or decision as to rights to benefits shall be conclusive for
all purposes of this chapter and shall not be subject to collateral at-
tack irrespective of notice.


(b) No finding of fact or conclusion of law contained in a decision or
determination rendered pursuant to this chapter by an appeals examiner,
the industrial commission, a court, or any other person authorized to
make such determinations shall have preclusive effect in any other ac-
tion or proceeding, except proceedings that are brought (i) pursuant
to this chapter, (ii) to collect unemployment insurance contributions,
(iii) to recover overpayments of unemployment insurance benefits, or
(iv) to challenge the constitutionality of provisions of this chapter
or administrative proceedings under this chapter.
(12) The provisions of the Idaho administrative procedure act, chapter
52, title 67, Idaho Code, regarding contested cases and judicial review of
contested cases are inapplicable to proceedings involving claimants under
the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 32. That Section 72-1374, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1374. UNAUTHORIZED DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION. If any of the fol-
lowing persons, in violation of the provisions of chapter 1, title 74,
Idaho Code, or section 72-1342, Idaho Code, or rules or department policies
promulgated thereunder, or the material terms of any confidentiality and
nondisclosure agreement, makes any unauthorized disclosure of employment
security information, each act of unauthorized disclosure shall constitute
a separate misdemeanor:
(1) Any employee of the department;
(2) Any employee or member of the commission;
(3) Any third party or employee thereof who has obtained employment se-
curity information pertaining to a person with the written, informed consent
of that person;
(4) Any public official who has obtained employment security informa-
tion for use in the performance of official duties; or
(5) Any person who has obtained employment security information
through means that violate the provisions of chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code,
or this chapter, or rules promulgated thereunder.
SECTION 33. That Section 72-1346A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
72-1346A. ADVANCES UNDER TITLE XII OF THE SOCIAL SECURITY ACT TO EM-
PLOYMENT SECURITY FUND -- FEDERAL ADVANCE INTEREST REPAYMENT FUND. (1) In
the event the director determines that it is necessary to obtain advances
from the federal unemployment account in the unemployment trust fund pur-
suant to title XII of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1321), and that a
request for such advances is authorized under section 1201 of the social se-
curity act, or under any other act of congress extending such authority, the
director shall request the governor to make application to the secretary of
labor of the United States for such advances.
(2) The governor is authorized to make application to the secretary of
labor of the United States to obtain advances pursuant to title XII of the
social security act (42 U.S.C. 1321 et seq.). Funds so advanced shall be for
the payment of unemployment insurance benefits.


(3) Any amount transferred to the employment security fund by the sec-
retary of the treasury of the United States in accordance with this section
shall be repaid from the employment security fund as provided in section 1202
of the social security act (42 U.S.C. 1322).
(4) There is established in the state treasury the "Federal Advance In-
terest Repayment Fund." This fund shall consist of all moneys collected pur-
suant to subsection (5) of this section and interest earned upon any moneys
in the fund. All moneys in the fund are perpetually appropriated to the di-
rector for the payment of interest on any advance made to this state pursuant
to title XII of the social security act, except that if, at the end of any cal-
endar year, all advances and interest have been repaid, any remaining bal-
ance in the fund shall be transferred to the employment security fund. In-
terest charges due and payable pursuant to section 1202 of the social secu-
rity act, may be paid by the director from the federal advance interest re-
payment fund. Such expenditures shall not be subject to any law requiring
specific appropriations or other formal release by state officers of money
in their custody, nor shall such expenditures require the approval of the
board of examiners.
(5) A federal advance interest repayment tax may be levied in accor-
dance with the following provisions when required under paragraph (b) of
this subsection:
(a) On the first day of the third month of a calendar quarter, the direc-
tor shall:
(i) Estimate the interest payable on federal advances obtained
under subsections (1) and (2) of this section;
(ii) Estimate the amount of federal advance interest repayment
tax receipts expected to be collected during the quarter for any
preceding calendar quarter in which such tax was assessed;
(iii) Add the amount in the federal advance interest repayment
fund on the last day of the immediately preceding calendar quarter
to the estimate in paragraph (ii) of this subsection; and
(iv) Subtract the sum obtained in paragraph (iii) from the esti-
mate in paragraph (i) of this subsection.
(b) If the remainder obtained under paragraph (iv) of subsection (5)(a)
of this section is more than zero, each covered employer subject to this
section may, at the director's sole discretion, be assessed a federal
advance interest repayment tax. Such tax shall be a percentage of the
contributions payable under sections 72-1349 and 72-1350, Idaho Code,
for the calendar quarter, but in no case shall be less than one dollar
($1.00). The percentage shall be determined by dividing the remainder
in paragraph (iv) of subsection (5)(a) of this section by the estimated
amount of contributions due and payable on wages paid during the quar-
ter. The percentage shall be rounded up to the next one-tenth of a per-
cent (0.1%).
(c) The tax assessed shall be collected and paid in accordance with such
rules as the director may prescribe. All such taxes collected shall be
deposited in the federal advance interest repayment fund. Any such tax
imposed in a calendar quarter shall be paid on or before the last day of
the second month following the close of such calendar quarter. An ex-


tension of time for payment may be granted for good cause in accordance
with section 72-1349(4)(6), Idaho Code.
(d) If any covered employer fails to pay such tax on or before the date
on which they are due, such tax shall bear penalty at a rate of five dol-
lars ($5.00) for each month or fraction thereof until paid; provided,
that in no case shall the penalty exceed the actual amount of the tax
due and payable. The date of payment shall be deemed the date of ac-
tual receipt by the director, or if mailed, the date of mailing. Penal-
ties collected pursuant to this subsection shall be paid into the fed-
eral advance interest payment fund. Furthermore, if any employer be-
comes delinquent in making payment of the tax as required by this sub-
section, such employer shall be subject to the collection provisions in
sections 72-1355 and 72-1360, Idaho Code.
(e) A covered employer may make application to the director for a re-
fund or credit of any amount erroneously paid as tax under this subsec-
tion. Such applications and the director's determinations regarding
them shall be made in accordance with the provisions of section 72-1357,
Idaho Code.
(f) This section does not apply to covered employers eligible and
electing the cost reimbursement payment method under section 72-1349A,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 34. That Section 72-1372, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-1372. CIVIL PENALTIES. (1) The following civil penalties shall be
assessed by the director:
(a) If a determination is made finding that an employer willfully filed
a false report, a monetary penalty equal to one hundred percent (100%)
of the amount that would be due if the employer had filed a correct re-
port or two hundred fifty dollars ($250), whichever is greater, shall
be added to the liability of the employer for each quarter for which the
employer willfully filed a false report. For the purposes of this sec-
tion, a false report includes, but is not limited to, a report for a pe-
riod wherein an employer pays remuneration for personal services which
meets the definition of "wages" under section 72-1328, Idaho Code, and
the payment is concealed, hidden, or otherwise not reported to the de-
partment.
(b) If a determination is made finding that an employer willfully
failed to file the employer's quarterly unemployment insurance tax re-
port when due, the director shall assess a monetary penalty equal to:
(i) Seventy-five dollars ($75.00) or twenty-five percent (25%)
of the amount that would be due if the employer had filed a timely
quarterly report, whichever is greater, if the employer had not
been found in any previous determination to have willfully failed
to file a timely quarterly report for any of the sixteen (16) pre-
ceding consecutive calendar quarters; or
(ii) One hundred fifty dollars ($150) or fifty percent (50%) of
the amount that would be due if the employer had filed a timely
quarterly report, whichever is greater, if the employer had been
found in any previous determination to have willfully failed to


file a timely quarterly report for no more than one (1) of the six-
teen (16) preceding consecutive calendar quarters; or
(iii) Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or one hundred percent
(100%) of the amount that would be due if the employer had filed a
timely quarterly report, whichever is greater, if the employer had
been found in any previous determination or determinations to have
willfully failed to file a timely quarterly report for two (2) or
more of the sixteen (16) preceding consecutive calendar quarters.
(c) If a determination is made finding that an employer, or any offi-
cer or agent or employee of the employer with the employer's knowledge,
willfully made a false statement or representation or willfully failed
to report a material fact when submitting facts to the department
concerning a claimant's separation from the employer, a penalty in
an amount equal to ten (10) times the weekly benefit amount of such
claimant shall be added to the liability of the employer.
(d) If a determination is made finding that an employer has induced, so-
licited, coerced or colluded with an employee or former employee to file
a false or fraudulent claim for benefits under this chapter, a penalty
in an amount equal to ten (10) times the weekly benefit amount of such
employee or former employee shall be added to the liability of the em-
ployer.
(e) If a determination is made finding that an employer failed to com-
plete and submit an Idaho business registration form when due, as re-
quired by section 72-1337(1), Idaho Code, a penalty of five hundred dol-
lars ($500) shall be assessed against the employer.
(f) For purposes of paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection, the term
"weekly benefit amount" means the amount determined by the director
pursuant to section 72-1367(2), Idaho Code.
(g) If a determination is made finding that a person has made any unau-
thorized disclosure of employment security information in violation of
the provisions of chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, or section 72-1342,
Idaho Code, or rules promulgated thereunder, a penalty of five hundred
dollars ($500) for each act of unauthorized disclosure shall be as-
sessed against the person.
(h) If a determination is made finding that a professional employer
failed to submit a separate quarterly wage report for each client as re-
quired in section 72-1349B(4)(9), Idaho Code, the director shall assess
a monetary penalty equal to one hundred dollars ($100) for each client
not separately reported by the professional employer; provided that the
maximum penalty for any quarter shall not exceed five thousand dollars
($5,000).
(2) At the discretion of the director, the department may waive all or
any part of the penalties imposed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section
if the employer shows to the satisfaction of the director that it had good
cause for failing to comply with the requirements of this chapter and rules
promulgated thereunder.
(3) Determinations imposing civil penalties pursuant to this section
shall be served in accordance with section 72-1368(5), Idaho Code. Penal-
ties imposed pursuant to this section shall be due and payable twenty (20)
days after the date the determination was served unless an appeal is filed


in accordance with section 72-1368, Idaho Code, and rules promulgated there-
under. Such appeals shall be conducted in accordance with section 72-1368,
Idaho Code, and rules promulgated thereunder.
(4) Civil penalties imposed by this section shall be in addition to any
other penalties authorized by this chapter. The provisions of this chap-
ter that apply to the collection of contributions, and the rules promulgated
thereunder, shall also apply to the collection of penalties imposed pursuant
to this section. Amounts collected pursuant to this section shall be paid
into the state employment security administrative and reimbursement fund as
established by section 72-1348, Idaho Code.
SECTION 35. The rules contained in IDAPA 09.01.01, Department of Labor,
relating to the Rules of Administrative Procedure of the Department of La-
bor, Section 026.; Section 027., Subsection 01.; Section 027., Subsection
03.; Section 035.; Section 037.; and Section 038., shall be null, void, and
of no force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 36. The rules contained in IDAPA 09.01.08, Department of Labor,
relating to Rules on Disclosure of Employment Security Information, shall be
null, void, and of no force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 37. The rules contained in IDAPA 09.01.30, Department of La-
bor, relating to Unemployment Insurance Benefits Administration Rules, Sec-
tion 010., Subsection 02.; Section 010., Subsection 03.; Section 010., Sub-
section 08.; Section 010., Subsection 09.; Section 010., Subsection 10.;
Section 100.; Section 150.; Section 175.; Section 275.; Section 325.; Sec-
tion 350.; Section 375., Subsection 01.; Section 375., Subsection 04.; Sec-
tion 400.; Section 425., Subsection 05.; Section 425., Subsection 06.; Sec-
tion 425., Subsection 09.; Section 450.; Section 460.; Section 475.; Section
500.; Section 525.; Section 575.; Section 600.; Section 650.; and Section
675., shall be null, void, and of no force and effect on and after July 1,
2025.
SECTION 38. The rules contained in IDAPA 09.01.35, Department of Labor,
relating to Unemployment Insurance Tax Administration Rules, Section 011.,
Subsection 01.; Section 011., Subsection 02.; Section 011., Subsection 08.;
Section 011., Subsection 10.; Section 051.; Section 056.; Section 061.; Sec-
tion 081.; Section 096.; Section 106.; Section 107.; Section 108.; Section
111.; Section 131.; Section 132.; Section 134.; Section 166., Subsection
01.; Section 186.; Section 221.; Section 231.; Section 241.; Section 256.;
Section 262.; and Section 263., shall be null, void, and of no force and ef-
fect on and after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 39. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.